   #Pew Research Center's Religion & Public Life Project RSS Feed
   alternate alternate JSON Representation Prism XML Version Plain Text
   Version

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MVFJNW

   Numbers, Facts and Trends Shaping Your World

   About Follow
   My Account
   Log in View Account Log out
   Donate

   Pew Research Center

   Religion & Public Life
     * Menu
     * Research Areas

     * Home
     * U.S. Politics
     * Media & News
     * Social Trends
     * Religion
     * Internet & Tech
     * Science
     * Hispanics
     * Global
     * Methods

     * Publications
     * Topics
     * Interactives
     * Data and Resources
     * Experts

   January 16, 2014

Plain Dealer: Credit for religious education bill passes through House, pits
Cleveland area Democrats against each other

Recent Publications

   Oct 3, 2019

For a Lot of American Teens, Religion Is a Regular Part of the Public School
Day

   Oct 3, 2019

Religion in the Public Schools

   Jul 23, 2019

What Americans Know About Religion

   Jul 15, 2019

A Closer Look at How Religious Restrictions Have Risen Around the World

   Jun 11, 2019

Americans See Catholic Clergy Sex Abuse as an Ongoing Problem

   Newsletter Sign Up ____________________ Sign Up
   Get Pew Research Center data by email ____________________ Signup

   Pew Research Center 1615 L St. NW, Suite 800 Washington, DC 20036 USA
   (+1) 202-419-4300 | Main (+1) 202-419-4349 | Fax (+1) 202-419-4372 |
   Media Inquiries

Research Areas

     * U.S. Politics & Policy
     * Journalism & Media
     * Internet & Technology
     * Science & Society
     * Religion & Public Life
     * Hispanic Trends
     * Global Attitudes & Trends
     * Social & Demographic Trends

Follow Us

     * Email Newsletters
     * Facebook
     * Twitter
     * Tumblr
     * YouTube
     * RSS

   About Pew Research Center Pew Research Center is a nonpartisan fact
   tank that informs the public about the issues, attitudes and trends
   shaping the world. It conducts public opinion polling, demographic
   research, media content analysis and other empirical social science
   research. Pew Research Center does not take policy positions. It is a
   subsidiary of The Pew Charitable Trusts.

     * Copyright 2019 Pew Research Center
     * About
     * Terms & Conditions
     * Privacy Policy
     * Reprints, Permissions & Use Policy
     * Feedback
     * Careers

   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-N8242V9
   #Pew Research Center's Religion & Public Life Project RSS Feed
   alternate alternate JSON Representation Prism XML Version Plain Text
   Version

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MVFJNW

   Numbers, Facts and Trends Shaping Your World

   About Follow
   My Account
   Log in View Account Log out
   Donate

   Pew Research Center

   Religion & Public Life
     * Menu
     * Research Areas

     * Home
     * U.S. Politics
     * Media & News
     * Social Trends
     * Religion
     * Internet & Tech
     * Science
     * Hispanics
     * Global
     * Methods

     * Publications
     * Topics
     * Interactives
     * Data and Resources
     * Experts

   October 3, 2019

For a Lot of American Teens, Religion Is a Regular Part of the Public School
Day

   Yet many other U.S. adolescents rarely observe religious behavior in
   their schools, and a majority say they rarely or never discuss religion
   with friends
   (Lewis Geyer/Digital First Media/Boulder Daily Camera via Getty Images)

   Religion in public schools has long been a controversial issue. The
   U.S. Supreme Court ruled in 1962 that teachers and administrators
   cannot lead prayers in public schools, and a decision in 2000 barred
   school districts from sponsoring student-led prayers at football games.
   At the same time, the court has held that students retain a First
   Amendment right to the free exercise of religion and may voluntarily
   pray before, during and after school. Where exactly to draw the line
   between constitutionally protected religious activity and impermissible
   state-sponsored religious indoctrination remains under dispute. This
   year, the Supreme Court declined to hear a case involving a high school
   coach who was fired for leading prayer after games, just one of several
   recent controversies in this area of law.

   While periodic battles continue in the courts, what is the day-to-day
   experience of students in public schools across the country? A new Pew
   Research Center survey asked a nationally representative sample of more
   than 1,800 teenagers (ages 13 to 17) about the kinds of religious
   activity they engage in – or see other students engaging in – during
   the course of the school day.

   The survey finds that about four-in-ten teens who attend public schools
   say they commonly (either “often” or “sometimes”) see other students
   praying before sporting events at school. This includes about half of
   teenage public schoolers who live in the South, where students are more
   likely than those in other regions to witness and partake in various
   religious expressions at school.

   Clothing and jewelry are most common forms of religious expression seen
   in public schools In addition, roughly half of U.S. teens who attend
   public school say they commonly see other students in their school
   wearing religious clothing (such as an Islamic headscarf) or jewelry
   with religious symbols (such as a necklace with a Christian cross or a
   Jewish Star of David).

   Four-in-ten U.S. teens see at least two of these five types of
   religious expression on a regular basis About a quarter of teens who
   attend public schools say they often or sometimes see students invite
   other students to religious youth groups or worship services. About
   one-in-six (16%) often or sometimes see other students praying before
   lunch in their public school. And 8% report that they commonly see
   other teenagers reading religious scripture outside of class during the
   school day.

   Overall, on an index combining these five types of religious
   expressions and activities by fellow students – wearing religious
   clothing or jewelry, praying before a sporting event, inviting other
   students to youth groups or services, praying before eating lunch, and
   reading religious scripture during the school day – 8% of teens in
   public schools say they commonly see all five (3%) or four out of five
   (5%). A third of students say they often or sometimes see two (20%) or
   three (13%) of these forms of religious expression in their public
   school, while 26% say they commonly see just one. And a third of public
   school teens (32%) say they rarely or never see any of these religious
   expressions by fellow students (or they did not answer the questions).
   Among teens in public schools in the South, 12% say teacher has ever
   led a class in prayer


   The survey also asked about two kinds of teacher-led, classroom
   activities. It finds that 8% of public school students say they have
   ever had a teacher lead their class in prayer – an action that the
   courts have ruled is a violation of the Establishment Clause of the
   Constitution.^1 An identical share (8%) say they have had a teacher
   read from the Bible as an example of literature, which the courts have
   said is fine. Both of these experiences are more common in the South
   (where 12% of public school students say a teacher has led their class
   in prayer, and 13% say a teacher has read to them from the Bible as
   literature) than in the Northeast (where just 2% say a teacher has lead
   them in prayer, and 3% say a teacher has read from the Bible as an
   example of literature).

   Nationwide, roughly four-in-ten teens (including 68% of evangelical
   Protestant teens) who go to public school say they think it is
   “appropriate” for a teacher to lead a class in prayer. Some of the
   teens who express this view are unaware of the Supreme Court’s ruling.
   But most know what the law is; 82% of U.S. teens in public schools (and
   79% of evangelical teens) correctly answer a factual question about the
   constitutionality of teacher-led prayer in public school classrooms.
   Just 16% of teens incorrectly believe that teacher-led prayer is
   allowed by law, far fewer than the 41% who say it is “appropriate.”

   Put another way, roughly half of teens who attend public school (53%)
   know that teacher-led prayer is prohibited and also find the practice
   inappropriate. At the same time, roughly three-in-ten (29%) know that
   it is unconstitutional but say that it is appropriate for a public
   school teacher to lead a class in prayer. Smaller shares think that
   teacher-led prayer is both legally permitted and appropriate (11%) or
   that it is permitted but inappropriate (4%).^2 A quarter of religiously
   affiliated teens say they sometimes or often pray before lunch in
   public school

   In addition to asking about what they have seen in school, the survey
   also asked teens who identify with a religion and attend a public
   school whether they personally participate in religious expressions in
   their school. Roughly three-in-ten or fewer say they regularly wear
   jewelry or clothing with religious symbols, pray before lunch, invite
   other students to worship services or a youth group, or leave school
   during the day to participate in religious activities.

   To be sure, some religiously affiliated public school students do many
   of these four things on a regular basis: 12% say they sometimes or
   often participate in three or more of these religious expressions at
   school. But roughly half (49%) of the students surveyed say they rarely
   or never participate in any of these religious expressions during the
   school day, or they did not answer the questions. In addition, only 5%
   of all public school students say that there is a religious support or
   prayer group that meets in their school and that they have taken part
   in it in the past year. The vast majority say that as far as they know,
   there is no such group in their school.

   An experience that is more common in American schools – both public and
   private – is bullying. The majority of U.S. teens surveyed say they
   either “often” (16%) or “sometimes” (38%) see students in their school
   being teased or made fun of. But this is rarely for religious reasons:
   Just 13% say they regularly see fellow students being teased because of
   their religion, and even fewer say they have directly experienced
   religiously motivated bullying. Overall, teens are far more likely to
   say they “rarely” or “never” see this type of bullying than they are to
   report that they sometimes or often witness such behavior.

   At the same time, roughly one-in-ten teens in public and private
   schools (9%) say that other students have made comments that are
   unfriendly to their personal religious or spiritual views, and 5% say
   that teachers have made such comments.

   These are among the key findings of a survey of 1,811 U.S. adolescents
   ages 13 to 17, conducted online from March 29 to April 14, 2019. The
   survey was administered using the Ipsos KnowledgePanel and asked
   questions of both a teenager and one of their parents; this report
   focuses on the responses of the teens. For more information on how this
   survey was conducted, see the Methodology.

   While several previous surveys have examined the religious lives of
   teenagers, this is the first large-scale, nationally representative
   survey asking teens a series of questions about their own practices and
   perceptions regarding religious expressions in public schools.

   This topic is important to the broader study of religion in American
   society because of the friendships adolescents form in their classes
   and the way they experience religion in public spaces during some of
   their most formative years.^3

   Evangelical Protestant teens most likely to pray at lunch and invite
   others to church or youth group The survey included teens from many
   religious backgrounds, including non-Christian faiths, such as Judaism,
   Islam, Buddhism and Hinduism. However, the sample of 1,811 teens did
   not include enough teens in those religious groups – or in some of the
   smaller Christian traditions, such as the Church of Jesus Christ of
   Latter-day Saints (sometimes called Mormons) or the historically black
   Protestant tradition – to allow their views to be analyzed and reported
   separately. The sample size is sufficient, though, to allow separate
   analysis of Catholic, evangelical Protestant, mainline Protestant and
   religiously unaffiliated teens.

   Other findings in this report include:
     * Teens who identify as evangelical Protestants are much more likely
       than Catholics and mainline Protestants to participate in religious
       activities in their public school, such as praying before lunch or
       inviting other students to their worship services or a religious
       youth group. For example, among teens who attend public schools,
       39% of evangelical Protestants say they sometimes or often pray
       before lunch, compared with 18% of Catholics and 11% of mainline
       Protestants who say they do this.
     * Teens with no religious affiliation – those who identify as
       atheist, agnostic or “nothing in particular,” sometimes called
       religious “nones” – are less likely than others to notice religious
       activities in their schools. For instance, just 17% of unaffiliated
       teens say they sometimes or often see other students invite someone
       to worship services or a religious youth group, compared with
       three-in-ten Christian teens (31%) who commonly see this happen.
       These differences may reflect their circles of friends, the schools
       they attend, their attentiveness to religious behavior, or other
       factors.
     * About three-quarters of all religiously affiliated teens (78%)
       report that at least some of their friends share their religion. A
       smaller proportion (60%) of all religiously unaffiliated teens say
       they have friends who identify – like they do – as atheist,
       agnostic or nothing in particular. Indeed, 19% of unaffiliated
       teens say that none of their friends are religiously unaffiliated,
       and an additional 19% say that “hardly any” of their friends share
       their lack of religious affiliation.
     * Most American teens (64%) say they rarely or never discuss religion
       with their friends, and only 5% say they often engage in such
       discussions. Again, evangelical Protestants are much more likely
       than others to engage in this type of religious behavior; roughly
       six-in-ten evangelical teens say they sometimes (47%) or often
       (11%) talk to their friends about religion, compared with
       four-in-ten mainline Protestant teens, a third of Catholics and
       about one-in-five religious “nones” who at least sometimes discuss
       religion with friends.

   more likely than boys to talk to their friends about religion
     * Religion seems to play a somewhat larger role in friendships for
       adolescent girls than for boys. The survey shows that girls are
       more likely than boys to talk to their friends about religion (41%
       vs. 31%) and somewhat more likely to be religiously similar to most
       of their friends. Girls who attend public school also are more
       likely to notice when other students wear clothing or jewelry with
       religious symbols and to invite other students to their religious
       youth group or worship services. This reflects a broader pattern
       among adults: Women are generally more religious than men,
       particularly among Christians.
     * Just 1% of mainline Protestant teens say they have ever been teased
       or made fun of in school for their religion, compared with 9% of
       Catholic teens and 10% of evangelicals who say the same.

   The rest of this report explores findings from the survey’s questions
   about religion in school and among teenagers’ friendship circles in
   more detail, including analysis by religious group, age and grade
   level, race or ethnicity, gender, and geographic region.

Religion in school

Most teens surveyed attend public schools, fewer attend private schools or
are home-schooled

   One-in-ten evangelical Protestants are home-schooled The vast majority
   (87%) of teenagers surveyed say they attend public schools.^4 An
   additional 5% attend religious private schools, while 6% are
   home-schooled. Just 1% attend a nonreligious private school.^5

   However, the type of school adolescents attend tends to vary depending
   on their self-described religious background. Teens who describe
   themselves as evangelical Protestants are more likely to be
   home-schooled (11%) than “nones” (5%) and Catholics (2%). And, not
   surprisingly, teens with a religious affiliation (6%) are more likely
   than those without one (1%) to attend a religious private school. The
   survey indicates that Catholic teens are more likely than Protestant
   teens (9% vs. 4%) to attend a religious school.

   Most of the analyses in this report are limited to teenagers who attend
   a public school. When it comes to experiences with religion in a school
   environment, adolescents who attend religious schools or are
   home-schooled are much different from those who do not, and the survey
   did not include sufficiently large samples of students who attend
   religious private schools, or who are being home-schooled, to compare
   these groups with teenagers who go to public schools.^6

Most U.S. teens commonly see at least one type of religious expression in
public school

   Some religious expressions are relatively common in public schools. For
   instance, about half (53%) of U.S. teens in public schools often or
   sometimes see other students wearing clothing or jewelry with religious
   symbols, and four-in-ten (39%) regularly see students praying before a
   sporting event.

   Other religious activities and expressions are less common. A quarter
   of teens in public schools (26%) say they often or sometimes see
   students inviting other students to religious youth groups or worship
   services. About one-in-six (16%) regularly see other teens praying
   before lunch, and 8% often or sometimes see students reading religious
   scripture outside of class. This means that large majorities of U.S.
   teens rarely or never see these behaviors in school.

   On an index combining all five of these types of religious expression
   in school, about a third of teens (32%) say they rarely or never see
   any of them (or they did not answer the questions), while just 3% say
   they see all five on a regular basis. Another way to sum up their
   experiences: On the one hand, a majority of teens (68%) report seeing
   at least one of these religious expressions or activities in their
   public schools often or sometimes; on the other hand, fewer than half
   (41%) say they commonly see more than one of these religious behaviors.

   There are substantial differences in what students tend to see in
   public school depending on the student’s religious affiliation.
   Religiously affiliated teens are more likely than unaffiliated teens to
   say they at least sometimes see each of the five types of religious
   activities or expressions in school. There also are differences among
   religiously affiliated teens. For instance, Protestant teens (38%) are
   twice as likely as Catholic teens (19%) to say they see students
   inviting other students to youth group or worship services at least
   sometimes. And there are differences even among Protestants:
   Evangelical Protestant teens (18%) are twice as likely as mainline
   Protestants (8%) to say they regularly see their peers reading
   religious scripture in school.

   It is not completely clear what accounts for such large differences in
   what adolescents see in their schools. It is possible that the tendency
   to have religiously similar friendship circles (see here) affects what
   students see.^7 For example, religious teens – who tend to have friends
   who are similarly religious – may be exposed to more religious
   activities and expressions. But it’s also possible that religious and
   nonreligious teens may perceive the world somewhat differently: What
   may appear as a religious expression to an evangelical Protestant teen
   may not even be noticed by a nonreligious teen. Yet another factor is
   that certain groups are concentrated in parts of the country where
   religious expressions may be more (or less) common.

   Indeed, geographic region of residence is also associated with how
   likely teens are to witness religious activities and expressions in
   school. Teens in the South – where adults, on average, are more
   religious than in other regions – are particularly likely to report
   seeing religious expressions in school. About a quarter (23%) of
   Southern teens often or sometimes see other students praying before
   lunch, compared with 13% in the Northeast and 11% in both the Midwest
   and West.

   Public school students in the South also are more likely than those in
   other regions to report seeing students pray before sporting events and
   wear clothing or jewelry with religious symbols.

   There also are gender, age, and racial and ethnic differences in what
   adolescents experience in school. Girls are more likely than boys to
   see students wearing religious jewelry or clothing as well as more
   likely to see students inviting other students to religious services or
   youth group. Older adolescents are especially likely to say they
   “often” or “sometimes” see students pray before sporting events. And
   white (non-Hispanic) teens are more likely than nonwhite teens to see
   students inviting other students to youth groups or services.^8
   Unaffiliated teens tend to see fewer religious expressions and
   activities in school

   Aside from what they see in school, what are adolescents doing in
   school, religiously speaking?

   The survey asked religiously affiliated teens about their own religious
   practices and expressions in school. Among public school teens who
   identify with a religion, 31% say they at least sometimes wear clothing
   or jewelry with religious symbols, and about a quarter say they
   sometimes or often pray before lunch (26%) or invite other students to
   their worship services or a religious youth group (24%).^9 One-in-ten
   religiously affiliated teens say they regularly leave school for
   religious activities or programs.

   Evangelical Protestants stand out on some of these measures. Roughly
   four-in-ten evangelical Protestant teens who attend public school say
   they at least sometimes pray before lunch at school (39%), compared
   with 18% of Catholic teens and 11% of mainline Protestant teens.
   Similarly, about four-in-ten evangelical teens (43%) say they sometimes
   or often invite other students to their worship services or youth
   group, compared with 21% of mainline Protestants and 12% of Catholics
   who say they do this. Evangelical Protestant adolescents (38%) also are
   more likely than mainline Protestants (26%) to regularly wear religious
   clothing or jewelry.

   There are differences between boys and girls on some of these measures.
   While four-in-ten religiously affiliated girls (39%) sometimes or often
   wear religious jewelry or clothing, a quarter of religiously affiliated
   boys (25%) do so. This may be due to overall differences in the amount
   of jewelry that girls and boys wear; if girls wear jewelry more often
   than boys do in general, it stands to reason that they would also wear
   religious jewelry more often. But there also are gender differences
   when it comes to inviting fellow students to church or youth group:
   Nearly three-in-ten girls (28%) report that they sometimes or often
   invite others to their youth group or worship services, compared with
   one-in-five boys (20%).

   Religious activities and expressions in public schools vary by region,
   too. Religiously affiliated teens in the South (38%) are more likely
   than those in the Midwest (23%), West (20%) and Northeast (13%) to
   report praying before lunch at school. Southern teens (31%) also are
   more likely than teens in the West (21%) and Northeast (14%) to invite
   other students to their youth group or worship services.
   Evangelical Protestant teens most likely to pray before lunch and
   invite others to church or youth group

Most teens do not have religious support groups in school

   Most U.S. teens say there are no religious support or prayer groups
   that meet in their school The vast majority of U.S. teens who attend
   public schools say there is no religious support group or prayer group
   that meets in their school (82%). Nearly one-in-five teens say that
   religious support or prayer groups do meet in their schools (17%),
   including 5% who say they have participated in such a group in the last
   year and 12% who have not done so.

   Among Protestant teens, roughly three-in-ten (31%) say that a religious
   support group or prayer group meets in their school. But far fewer
   Catholics and religious “nones” say the same: Only about one-in-ten
   Catholic and unaffiliated teens report that their school hosts such a
   group.^10

   Unaffiliated teens also are highly unlikely to attend a support group,
   with fewer than 1% saying they have done so in the past year (the
   question was intended to capture nonreligious groups as well, such as
   the Secular Student Alliance). Protestant teens are somewhat more
   likely than their Catholic peers to participate in religious or prayer
   groups in school (11% vs 6%).

   Teens’ awareness of, and attendance at, religious support or prayer
   groups at their school also varies by region, with teens in the South
   more likely to say that prayer or religious support groups meet in
   their public school and that they, personally, participate in such
   activities, compared with those in the Northeast and West. Still, just
   9% of Southern teens who go to public school say that in the past year
   they have attended a prayer group or religious support group (such as
   the Fellowship of Christian Athletes) that meets in their school.

Religion in the classroom relatively rare

   About one-in-ten Southern teens in public schools say teacher has led
   prayer Relatively few U.S. teens in public schools report that they
   have ever seen teachers either lead a class in prayer (8%) or read from
   the Bible as an example of literature (8%).^11

   Protestant teens (11%) are more likely than unaffiliated teens (5%) to
   report that a teacher has led their class in prayer, and to report that
   a teacher has read from the Bible as an example of literature (12% vs.
   4%).

   Adolescents’ reports of teachers’ religious activities in the classroom
   also vary by race and ethnicity and region. Nonwhite teens are more
   likely than white (non-Hispanic) teens to say a teacher has led their
   class in prayer (11% vs. 5%) and read from the Bible as literature (12%
   vs. 6%). And teens in the South are especially likely to say a teacher
   has led their class in prayer (12%) and read from the Bible (13%) when
   compared with the small shares of teens in the Northeast who report the
   same (2% and 3%, respectively).

   Gender, age and grade are not associated with having seen teachers lead
   a class in prayer or read from the Bible as literature.

   Evangelical Protestant teens most likely to approve of teacher leading
   a class in prayer What do students in public schools think about
   teachers leading a class in prayer or reading from the Bible as an
   example of literature?

   About four-in-ten (41%) say they think it is appropriate for a teacher
   in their school to lead a class in prayer, and 55% say it is
   appropriate for a teacher to read from the Bible as an example of
   literature. But there are large differences by religion.

   Among those in public schools, religiously affiliated students (49%)
   are about twice as likely as religious “nones” (25%) to think it is
   acceptable for a teacher to lead a class in prayer. Affiliated
   adolescents also are more likely than “nones” to think it is acceptable
   for a teacher to read from the Bible as literature (62% vs. 42%).

   There are large differences among religiously affiliated adolescents as
   well. For instance, six-in-ten Protestants approve of a teacher leading
   a class in prayer, compared with four-in-ten Catholics who say this.
   Evangelical Protestants are especially likely to approve of teachers
   bringing religion into the classroom: Two-thirds of evangelical
   Protestant teens (68%) say it is appropriate for a teacher to lead a
   class in prayer, compared with four-in-ten mainline Protestants (41%).
   Roughly eight-in-ten evangelical Protestant teens approve of a teacher
   reading from the Bible as an example of literature (82%), compared with
   six-in-ten mainline Protestant teens who say this (59%).

   Views toward teachers bringing religion into the classroom also vary
   across racial and ethnic groups, regions, and grade levels. Nonwhite
   teens are more supportive of teachers praying: 46% of nonwhite teens
   think it is appropriate for teachers in public schools to lead a class
   in prayer, while 36% of non-Hispanic white teens think so. But there
   are no differences between white and nonwhite teens in views toward
   teachers reading from the Bible as an example of literature.

   Teens in the South and Midwest are particularly likely to approve of
   teachers praying and reading from the Bible in class. About half (55%)
   of Southern teens in public schools say it is appropriate for a teacher
   to lead a class in prayer. By comparison, three-in-ten teens in the
   West (30%) and Northeast (28%) think it is acceptable for a teacher to
   lead a class in prayer. There is a similar pattern on the question
   about teachers reading the Bible as literature.

   Teens who have been in school for more years are less supportive of
   teachers praying in the classroom. Nearly half (47%) of pre-high school
   teens think it is appropriate for a teacher to lead a class in prayer,
   compared with 37% of those in 11th and 12th grades.

   Most teens in public schools know their teachers are not permitted to
   lead a class in prayer The survey also asked teens what they know about
   the U.S. Supreme Court’s stance on teacher-led prayer, finding that
   those in 8th grade or lower are more likely than those in 9th through
   12th grades to incorrectly say that the court permits the practice (20%
   vs. 14%).

   Overall, most U.S. teens in public schools (82%) know that their
   teachers are not permitted to lead a class in prayer, according to
   rulings by the U.S. Supreme Court. At the same time, 16% think this is
   legally allowed – although this is much smaller than the share who
   think it would be appropriate (41%). Among just those who say
   teacher-led prayer is appropriate, a somewhat higher share believe it
   is permitted by law (28%), but 70% still know that it is
   unconstitutional.

   U.S. teens are much less familiar with the law when it comes to reading
   from the Bible as an example of literature, which the Supreme Court has
   ruled permissible. About a third (36%) of U.S. teens in public school
   know that their teachers are permitted to do this, while six-in-ten
   (62%) think it is not allowed.

   Evangelical Protestant teens stand out from other traditions on this
   measure: 47% know that public school teachers are allowed to read from
   the Bible as literature, compared with about a third each of mainline
   Protestant teens (34%), religious “nones” (33%) and Catholics (32%).

   In contrast with the question about teacher-led prayer, teens in 11th
   and 12th grades are less likely to correctly answer this question than
   those in eighth grade or lower.

   There are no statistically significant differences across regions on
   either of these questions.

Relatively few teens witness religion-related bullying in schools

   Majority of teens regularly witness bullying at school To further
   explore what teens are encountering in their schools, the survey asked
   about experiences with teasing, bullying and being subject to
   unfriendly comments. The analyses of bullying and hostility toward
   religion in school include students in both religious and nonreligious
   schools (but not those who are home-schooled). ^12

   Many educators, parents, and researchers have pointed out that bullying
   is a major concern in U.S. schools, and the new survey finds that 54%
   of U.S. teens report regularly seeing students in their school being
   teased or made fun of – including 16% who say they often see this and
   38% who sometimes see it. About three-in-ten say they rarely witness
   bullying in school, while 14% say they never see it.

   Christians and religious “nones,” boys and girls, and older and younger
   teens are all about equally likely to witness bullying in school. Teens
   who live in the Midwest (59%) and the South (58%) are somewhat more
   likely than those in the West (46%) to say they see other students
   being teased or made fun of in school with any regularity. But, on the
   whole, there is little variation in how often students in these various
   demographic categories report witnessing bullying.

   Most teens rarely or never witness religiously motivated bullying in
   their school While many teens in both public and private schools
   observe bullying in their school, fewer say that they see other
   students being teased or made fun of because of their religion,
   specifically. In fact, six-in-ten (58%) say they never witness this
   type of behavior, and 28% say they rarely see it. One-in-ten say that
   they sometimes see religiously motivated bullying in their school
   (11%), and 2% see this often.

   On this question, mainline Protestants stand out from other religious
   groups as being the least likely to say that they regularly see
   religious bullying in their school. Just 3% say they witness this
   behavior at least sometimes, compared with 11% among religious “nones,”
   13% among Catholic teens and 17% among evangelicals. Evangelical teens
   are the least likely to say that they never see religious bullying in
   their school (48%).

   Across many demographic groups, most school-attending teens rarely, if
   ever, see other students being bullied for their religion. There are
   virtually no differences between boys and girls, younger and older
   teens, or across regions on this question.

   Few teens subject to religious bullying in their school Among public or
   private school students who are affiliated with a religious tradition,
   roughly one-in-ten say that they, personally, have ever been teased or
   made fun of in school because of their religion.^13

   Just 1% of mainline Protestant teens say they have ever been bullied in
   school for their religion, compared with 10% of evangelicals and 9% of
   Catholic teens who say the same.

   There are few discernible differences on this question among
   religiously affiliated teens by gender, age, and race and ethnicity.
   Roughly one-in-ten or fewer in each demographic group say they have
   personally been teased or made fun of in school because of their
   religion.

   Unaffiliated teens were asked a similar question about being teased for
   their lack of religion.  Among students who identify religiously as
   atheist, agnostic or “nothing in particular,” very few (4%) say they
   have personally experienced bullying in school because they are not
   religious.

   About one-in-ten affiliated, unaffiliated teens say other students have
   been unfriendly to their religious beliefs The survey also asked teens
   whether other students have been “unfriendly” to their religious or
   spiritual views. Those who said “yes” then had the opportunity to
   explain, in their own words, how this has occurred, with the goal of
   getting more details about any religiously motivated bullying that
   teens may be facing in school.

   Overall, about one-in-ten of all school-attending adolescents report
   that other students have been unfriendly toward their religious views.
   And they give a wide range of responses to demonstrate just what they
   are experiencing from their peers.

   Some religiously affiliated students say they have been bullied for
   their religious beliefs (3%). They report some general examples, such
   as other students “making fun of my religion,” “they make fun of me
   going to church” or “they think I attend church too much.” Other teens
   give examples of more specific comments they have experienced, such as
   “someone told me that they used to think I was intelligent until they
   found out I believed in God” and “[they] made fun of Catholics.”

   A similar share of religiously unaffiliated students (4%) give examples
   of how they feel bullied for their lack of religious beliefs. They
   report that their peers “[say] that I was the reason the country is
   going downhill” and that “they say I’ll go to hell for not believing in
   [G]od.”

   Equally small shares of both affiliated and unaffiliated teens (1%
   each) note that they have lost friends or felt distanced from former
   friends due to different beliefs.

   Few teens have experienced teachers being unfriendly to their religion
   School-attending teens are slightly less likely to say that teachers
   have been unfriendly toward their religious or spiritual views than
   they are to say the same about other students (5% vs. 9%). Those who
   report that they have experienced this type of behavior by a teacher
   cite a variety of circumstances and ways in which it has happened.

   Some teens who belong to a religion offer responses that indicate a
   teacher challenged the students’ religious beliefs, including
   questioning a student’s intelligence (2%). These teens report
   experiences such as, “I had a life science teacher once talk for 30
   minutes about why religion is stupid and a joke” and “they’ve made fun
   of me and not supported me in going to my before school scripture study
   class.”

   At the other end of the spectrum, some teens who identify as religious
   “nones” report animosity toward their views from teachers who the teens
   perceive as promoting their own beliefs (2%). One student recalls a
   teacher “posting pro Christianity posters in [the] classroom, making
   negative comments about those who don’t worship Christianity.” Another
   says: “A few teachers kinda force me to believe that [G]od is real.”

   One-in-ten teenage students report teachers making them uncomfortable
   with comments about religion The survey also asked students a more
   general question: Has a teacher ever said anything about religion that
   made you feel uncomfortable? About one-in-ten students say they have
   experienced this type of discomfort in their schools, with some small
   distinctions between those who have a religion and those who do not.

   Some religiously affiliated students share examples of teachers
   challenging religious beliefs, even if they were not personally
   challenging the respondent: “[The teachers said] that God was make
   believe and religion was to control the masses” and “taught us multiple
   religions as if they were all true.” At the same time, some students
   who identify as religious “nones” note their discomfort when they
   perceive teachers as promoting particular religious beliefs. For
   instance, one teen reports that teachers have “brought the [Ten
   Commandments] to class and preached.” Some expound on why a teacher’s
   comments were unacceptable: “This teacher was heavily promoting having
   a relationship with God as being the most important thing in life and I
   didn’t think that was appropriate to express while teaching an
   unrelated subject.”

Teenage friendships and religion

   Affiliated teens more likely to have religiously similar friends
   According to sociologists, religion is usually a social phenomenon,
   taking place among a community of believers.^14 People affect – and are
   affected by – the religious and spiritual beliefs and activities of
   their friends and family. Contemporary research points to the idea that
   social interactions promote and maintain religious worldviews.^15 And
   among teenagers, too, there is evidence that the friendships
   adolescents form in school influence their religious trajectories.^16

   Indeed, most teens have at least some friends who share their religion
   (or lack thereof). Overall, only about a quarter (27%) say that “hardly
   any” or “none” of their friends share their religion – or, in the case
   of unaffiliated respondents, that “hardly any” or “none” of their
   friends are atheist, agnostic, or have no particular religion.
   Three-in-ten teens report that most or all of their friends share their
   religion, and even more (43%) say some of their friends share their
   religious identity.

   There is good reason to expect that this should vary by religion. Most
   Americans identify as Christians of some kind, meaning it may be harder
   for nonreligious adolescents to find friends who are like them,
   religiously. That is borne out by the data: Religiously affiliated
   teens as a whole are roughly twice as likely as religious “nones” (36%
   vs. 16%) to report that most or all of their friends share their
   religion (or lack thereof). About four-in-ten unaffiliated teens (38%)
   say that hardly any or none of their friends are, like them, atheist,
   agnostic or “nothing in particular” when it comes to religion.

   Among adults, some religious groups are more likely than others to have
   friendship networks that reflect their own beliefs or affiliations.^17
   Protestants, for example, are overall less likely than Catholics,
   members of non-Christian faiths and religious “nones” to have
   interreligious social connections. But, unlike adults, Protestant
   adolescents are no more likely than Catholic teens to say that most or
   all of their friends share their religion.^18

   Aside from religious affiliation, region, age and grade play few, if
   any, statistically significant roles in the religious makeup of
   adolescents’ social networks. But gender is a factor. A third of girls
   (33%) report that most or all of their friends share their religious
   identity, making them moderately more likely than boys (27%) to be in
   that situation.

Most teens do not regularly talk to friends about religion

   Evangelical Protestant teens especially likely to talk to friends about
   religion For most teens, religion is not a regular topic of
   conversation with friends. Roughly two-thirds (64%) say they rarely or
   never talk to their friends about religion. Still, a sizable minority
   of American teenagers (36%) say they sometimes or often talk with
   friends about religion.

   Not surprisingly, religious teens are particularly likely to engage in
   these kinds of discussions. Almost half (45%) of religiously affiliated
   teens report that they regularly (that is, “sometimes” or “often”) talk
   to their friends about religion. Conversely, only 17% of unaffiliated
   teens at least sometimes talk to their friends about religion.

   But there also are differences among religiously affiliated teens. A
   majority of evangelical Protestant teens (58%) regularly talk to their
   friends about religion, compared with about four-in-ten mainline
   Protestant teens (39%) and roughly a third of Catholics (35%).

   In addition to religious affiliation, gender and region also are
   related factors. Four-in-ten girls (41%) report sometimes or often
   talking to their friends about religion; just three-in-ten boys (31%)
   say the same.

   Adolescents in the South are particularly likely to talk to their
   friends about religion. About four-in-ten Southern teens (41%) report
   doing so at least sometimes, while smaller shares in the West (31%) and
   Northeast (29%) say the same.

   There are fewer differences across age, grade, and race and ethnicity
   in how frequently teens report talking with friends about religion.
    1. Teens were asked if they have ever had a teacher lead their class
       in prayer, not just in their current school. It is possible that
       some teens who have experienced teacher-led prayer and now attend
       public schools may have attended other types of schools (for
       example, private school or home school) in the past and experienced
       teacher-led prayer in those places, which is not a violation of the
       Constitution. ↩
    2. A small share (3%) of teenage public school students did not answer
       one or both of these questions on teacher-led prayer. ↩
    3. Religion and American Public Education: Conservative Religious
       Agendas and the U.S. Constitution.” Education and Urban Society.
       Also see Cheadle, Jacob E. and Philip Schwadel. 2012. “The
       ‘Friendship Dynamics of Religion,’ or the ‘Religious Dynamics of
       Friendship’? A Social Network Analysis of Adolescents Who Attend
       Small Schools.” Social Science Research. ↩
    4. The figures for teens who attend public school here and throughout
       the report include those who say they attend charter or magnet
       schools. ↩
    5. According to 2019 estimates from the National Center for Education
       Statistics (NCES), 9% of high school students enrolled in school
       (not counting home-schooled students) are in private schools. In
       the survey sample, 5% of high school students enrolled in schools
       are in private schools. It is more difficult to calculate a
       national estimate for those who are home-schooled because U.S.
       states vary in their laws around reporting home-schooling
       statistics. Nonetheless, the NCES estimates that 4% of high
       school-aged adolescents in the U.S. were home-schooled in 2016, the
       most recent year for which the estimates are available. ↩
    6. An additional reason for this analytical decision is to avoid
       conflating the associations between adolescent characteristics and
       religious experiences in schools with the type of school teens
       attend. For example, Catholic teens who attend Catholic schools are
       presumably much more likely to experience prayer and other
       religious activities in school, which would disproportionately
       affect the Catholic figures in the analysis. See Uecker, Jeremy E.
       2008. “Alternative Schooling Strategies and the Religious Lives of
       American Adolescents.” Journal for the Scientific Study of
       Religion. ↩
    7. For a discussion of Americans’ tendency to have friends who are
       religiously like themselves, see McPherson, Miller, Lynn
       Smith-Lovin and James M. Cook. 2001. “Birds of a Feather: Homophily
       in Social Networks.” Annual Review of Sociology. ↩
    8. The net nonwhite category includes teens who identify as black,
       Asian, Hispanic, some other race, or multiple races. It is the unit
       of analysis in this survey because the sample sizes for most of the
       nonwhite categories are too small to analyze individually. The
       combined category is used in this report so that broad comparisons
       can be made to highlight differences between groups. Researchers
       prefer to break out subgroups when possible to show the differences
       that may exist between groups of people. The use of a net nonwhite
       category is not intended to obscure the fact that the religious
       experiences and behaviors of black Americans, Hispanic Americans,
       and Americans of other races and ethnicities may be quite
       different. ↩
    9. The survey did not ask teens specifically how they pray before
       lunch, therefore this practice could include everything from prayer
       with a public component (for example, prayers said aloud or prayers
       preceded by or followed by the sign of the cross) to private
       prayers that students pray silently. ↩
   10. This question was asked of both religiously affiliated and
       unaffiliated teens and included examples of religious groups (for
       example, the Fellowship of Christian Athletes) and nonreligious
       groups (the question referenced the “Secular Student Association”)
       under the broader umbrella of religious support or prayer groups. ↩
   11. Teens were asked if they have ever had a teacher lead their class
       in prayer, not just in their current school. It is possible that
       some teens who have experienced teacher-led prayer and now attend
       public schools may have attended other types of schools (for
       example, private school or home school) in the past and experienced
       teacher-led prayer in those places, which is not a violation of the
       Constitution. ↩
   12. The analyses here are expanded to include private schools because
       research shows that bullying is not limited to public schools. And,
       even when examining religiously motivated bullying, there are not
       the same concerns about conflating the type of school a teen
       attends (e.g. religious private school) with the potential types of
       unfriendliness toward religion that he or she may experience in
       that setting. See Choy, Susan P. 1997. “Public and Private Schools:
       How Do They Differ?” National Center for Education Statistics. ↩
   13. Much of the research on religion-related bullying focuses on
       minority religions, such as Judaism and Islam in the United States.
       This report, however, does not analyze responses from Jewish or
       Muslim teens separately due to insufficient sample sizes. Jewish
       and Muslim teens (and those from other religious groups) are
       included in the full sample and in the analysis of religiously
       affiliated teens. See Dupper, David R., Shandra Forrest-Bank and
       Autumn Lowry-Carusillo. 2015. “Experiences of Religious Minorities
       in Public School Settings: Findings from Focus Groups Involving
       Muslim, Jewish, Catholic, and Unitarian Universalist Youths.”
       Children & Schools. ↩
   14. The social nature of religion is a key theme in social scientific
       research. This is perhaps most famously associated with the work of
       the sociologist Emile Durkheim. Durkheim argued that interaction
       among co-religionists creates and reinforces religion by fostering
       solidarity through the creation and veneration of shared symbols.
       See Durkheim, Emile. 1912. “The Elementary Forms of the Religious
       Life.” ↩
   15. Stroope, Samuel. 2012. “Social Networks and Religion: The Role of
       Congregational Social Embeddedness in Religious Belief and
       Practice.” Sociology of Religion. ↩
   16. Cheadle, Jacob E. and Philip Schwadel. 2012. “The ‘Friendship
       Dynamics of Religion,’ or the ‘Religious Dynamics of Friendship’? A
       Social Network Analysis of Adolescents Who Attend Small Schools.”
       Social Science Research. ↩
   17. Smith, Christian. 1998. “American Evangelicalism: Embattled and
       Thriving.” ↩
   18. For the research on interreligious social connections by religious
       group, see Scheitle, Christopher P. and Buster G. Smith. 2011. “A
       Note on the Frequency and Sources of Close Interreligious Ties.”
       Journal for the Scientific Study of Religion. ↩

Pagination

   Next: Acknowledgments Next Page → ← Prev Page
    1. You are reading page 1
    2. Page 2
    3. Page 3

Report Materials

     * Complete Report PDF
     * Topline
     * Appendix A: Detailed tables
     * Essay: Religion in Public Schools

Table of Contents

     * Overview
          + Religion in school
          + Relatively few teens witness religion-related bullying in
            schools
          + Teenage friendships and religion
     * Acknowledgments
     * Methodology

Related

   PublicationsOct 3, 2019

Religion in the Public Schools

   PublicationsJul 23, 2019

What Americans Know About Religion

   PublicationsJul 15, 2019

A Closer Look at How Religious Restrictions Have Risen Around the World

   PublicationsJun 11, 2019

Americans See Catholic Clergy Sex Abuse as an Ongoing Problem

   PublicationsApr 30, 2019

In Western European Countries With Church Taxes, Support for the Tradition
Remains Strong

Topics

     * Religion and Society
     * Education
     * Teens and Youth

Popular On Pew Research

   Fact Tank01/17/2019

Defining generations: Where Millennials end and Generation Z begins

   Fact Tank09/06/2018

Are you in the American middle class? Find out with our income calculator

   Fact Tank11/28/2018

5 facts about illegal immigration in the U.S.

   Internet & Tech03/01/2018

Social Media Use in 2018

   Social Trends01/17/2019

Generation Z Looks a Lot Like Millennials on Key Social and Political Issues

   Get Pew Research Center data by email ____________________ Signup

   Pew Research Center 1615 L St. NW, Suite 800 Washington, DC 20036 USA
   (+1) 202-419-4300 | Main (+1) 202-419-4349 | Fax (+1) 202-419-4372 |
   Media Inquiries

Research Areas

     * U.S. Politics & Policy
     * Journalism & Media
     * Internet & Technology
     * Science & Society
     * Religion & Public Life
     * Hispanic Trends
     * Global Attitudes & Trends
     * Social & Demographic Trends

Follow Us

     * Email Newsletters
     * Facebook
     * Twitter
     * Tumblr
     * YouTube
     * RSS

   About Pew Research Center Pew Research Center is a nonpartisan fact
   tank that informs the public about the issues, attitudes and trends
   shaping the world. It conducts public opinion polling, demographic
   research, media content analysis and other empirical social science
   research. Pew Research Center does not take policy positions. It is a
   subsidiary of The Pew Charitable Trusts.

     * Copyright 2019 Pew Research Center
     * About
     * Terms & Conditions
     * Privacy Policy
     * Reprints, Permissions & Use Policy
     * Feedback
     * Careers

   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-N8242V9
   #Pew Research Center's Religion & Public Life Project RSS Feed
   alternate alternate JSON Representation Prism XML Version Plain Text
   Version

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MVFJNW

   Numbers, Facts and Trends Shaping Your World

   About Follow
   My Account
   Log in View Account Log out
   Donate

   Pew Research Center

   Religion & Public Life
     * Menu
     * Research Areas

     * Home
     * U.S. Politics
     * Media & News
     * Social Trends
     * Religion
     * Internet & Tech
     * Science
     * Hispanics
     * Global
     * Methods

     * Publications
     * Topics
     * Interactives
     * Data and Resources
     * Experts

   October 3, 2019

For a Lot of American Teens, Religion Is a Regular Part of the Public School
Day

   Yet many other U.S. adolescents rarely observe religious behavior in
   their schools, and a majority say they rarely or never discuss religion
   with friends
   (Lewis Geyer/Digital First Media/Boulder Daily Camera via Getty Images)

   Religion in public schools has long been a controversial issue. The
   U.S. Supreme Court ruled in 1962 that teachers and administrators
   cannot lead prayers in public schools, and a decision in 2000 barred
   school districts from sponsoring student-led prayers at football games.
   At the same time, the court has held that students retain a First
   Amendment right to the free exercise of religion and may voluntarily
   pray before, during and after school. Where exactly to draw the line
   between constitutionally protected religious activity and impermissible
   state-sponsored religious indoctrination remains under dispute. This
   year, the Supreme Court declined to hear a case involving a high school
   coach who was fired for leading prayer after games, just one of several
   recent controversies in this area of law.

   While periodic battles continue in the courts, what is the day-to-day
   experience of students in public schools across the country? A new Pew
   Research Center survey asked a nationally representative sample of more
   than 1,800 teenagers (ages 13 to 17) about the kinds of religious
   activity they engage in – or see other students engaging in – during
   the course of the school day.

   The survey finds that about four-in-ten teens who attend public schools
   say they commonly (either “often” or “sometimes”) see other students
   praying before sporting events at school. This includes about half of
   teenage public schoolers who live in the South, where students are more
   likely than those in other regions to witness and partake in various
   religious expressions at school.

   Clothing and jewelry are most common forms of religious expression seen
   in public schools In addition, roughly half of U.S. teens who attend
   public school say they commonly see other students in their school
   wearing religious clothing (such as an Islamic headscarf) or jewelry
   with religious symbols (such as a necklace with a Christian cross or a
   Jewish Star of David).

   Four-in-ten U.S. teens see at least two of these five types of
   religious expression on a regular basis About a quarter of teens who
   attend public schools say they often or sometimes see students invite
   other students to religious youth groups or worship services. About
   one-in-six (16%) often or sometimes see other students praying before
   lunch in their public school. And 8% report that they commonly see
   other teenagers reading religious scripture outside of class during the
   school day.

   Overall, on an index combining these five types of religious
   expressions and activities by fellow students – wearing religious
   clothing or jewelry, praying before a sporting event, inviting other
   students to youth groups or services, praying before eating lunch, and
   reading religious scripture during the school day – 8% of teens in
   public schools say they commonly see all five (3%) or four out of five
   (5%). A third of students say they often or sometimes see two (20%) or
   three (13%) of these forms of religious expression in their public
   school, while 26% say they commonly see just one. And a third of public
   school teens (32%) say they rarely or never see any of these religious
   expressions by fellow students (or they did not answer the questions).
   Among teens in public schools in the South, 12% say teacher has ever
   led a class in prayer


   The survey also asked about two kinds of teacher-led, classroom
   activities. It finds that 8% of public school students say they have
   ever had a teacher lead their class in prayer – an action that the
   courts have ruled is a violation of the Establishment Clause of the
   Constitution.^1 An identical share (8%) say they have had a teacher
   read from the Bible as an example of literature, which the courts have
   said is fine. Both of these experiences are more common in the South
   (where 12% of public school students say a teacher has led their class
   in prayer, and 13% say a teacher has read to them from the Bible as
   literature) than in the Northeast (where just 2% say a teacher has lead
   them in prayer, and 3% say a teacher has read from the Bible as an
   example of literature).

   Nationwide, roughly four-in-ten teens (including 68% of evangelical
   Protestant teens) who go to public school say they think it is
   “appropriate” for a teacher to lead a class in prayer. Some of the
   teens who express this view are unaware of the Supreme Court’s ruling.
   But most know what the law is; 82% of U.S. teens in public schools (and
   79% of evangelical teens) correctly answer a factual question about the
   constitutionality of teacher-led prayer in public school classrooms.
   Just 16% of teens incorrectly believe that teacher-led prayer is
   allowed by law, far fewer than the 41% who say it is “appropriate.”

   Put another way, roughly half of teens who attend public school (53%)
   know that teacher-led prayer is prohibited and also find the practice
   inappropriate. At the same time, roughly three-in-ten (29%) know that
   it is unconstitutional but say that it is appropriate for a public
   school teacher to lead a class in prayer. Smaller shares think that
   teacher-led prayer is both legally permitted and appropriate (11%) or
   that it is permitted but inappropriate (4%).^2 A quarter of religiously
   affiliated teens say they sometimes or often pray before lunch in
   public school

   In addition to asking about what they have seen in school, the survey
   also asked teens who identify with a religion and attend a public
   school whether they personally participate in religious expressions in
   their school. Roughly three-in-ten or fewer say they regularly wear
   jewelry or clothing with religious symbols, pray before lunch, invite
   other students to worship services or a youth group, or leave school
   during the day to participate in religious activities.

   To be sure, some religiously affiliated public school students do many
   of these four things on a regular basis: 12% say they sometimes or
   often participate in three or more of these religious expressions at
   school. But roughly half (49%) of the students surveyed say they rarely
   or never participate in any of these religious expressions during the
   school day, or they did not answer the questions. In addition, only 5%
   of all public school students say that there is a religious support or
   prayer group that meets in their school and that they have taken part
   in it in the past year. The vast majority say that as far as they know,
   there is no such group in their school.

   An experience that is more common in American schools – both public and
   private – is bullying. The majority of U.S. teens surveyed say they
   either “often” (16%) or “sometimes” (38%) see students in their school
   being teased or made fun of. But this is rarely for religious reasons:
   Just 13% say they regularly see fellow students being teased because of
   their religion, and even fewer say they have directly experienced
   religiously motivated bullying. Overall, teens are far more likely to
   say they “rarely” or “never” see this type of bullying than they are to
   report that they sometimes or often witness such behavior.

   At the same time, roughly one-in-ten teens in public and private
   schools (9%) say that other students have made comments that are
   unfriendly to their personal religious or spiritual views, and 5% say
   that teachers have made such comments.

   These are among the key findings of a survey of 1,811 U.S. adolescents
   ages 13 to 17, conducted online from March 29 to April 14, 2019. The
   survey was administered using the Ipsos KnowledgePanel and asked
   questions of both a teenager and one of their parents; this report
   focuses on the responses of the teens. For more information on how this
   survey was conducted, see the Methodology.

   While several previous surveys have examined the religious lives of
   teenagers, this is the first large-scale, nationally representative
   survey asking teens a series of questions about their own practices and
   perceptions regarding religious expressions in public schools.

   This topic is important to the broader study of religion in American
   society because of the friendships adolescents form in their classes
   and the way they experience religion in public spaces during some of
   their most formative years.^3

   Evangelical Protestant teens most likely to pray at lunch and invite
   others to church or youth group The survey included teens from many
   religious backgrounds, including non-Christian faiths, such as Judaism,
   Islam, Buddhism and Hinduism. However, the sample of 1,811 teens did
   not include enough teens in those religious groups – or in some of the
   smaller Christian traditions, such as the Church of Jesus Christ of
   Latter-day Saints (sometimes called Mormons) or the historically black
   Protestant tradition – to allow their views to be analyzed and reported
   separately. The sample size is sufficient, though, to allow separate
   analysis of Catholic, evangelical Protestant, mainline Protestant and
   religiously unaffiliated teens.

   Other findings in this report include:
     * Teens who identify as evangelical Protestants are much more likely
       than Catholics and mainline Protestants to participate in religious
       activities in their public school, such as praying before lunch or
       inviting other students to their worship services or a religious
       youth group. For example, among teens who attend public schools,
       39% of evangelical Protestants say they sometimes or often pray
       before lunch, compared with 18% of Catholics and 11% of mainline
       Protestants who say they do this.
     * Teens with no religious affiliation – those who identify as
       atheist, agnostic or “nothing in particular,” sometimes called
       religious “nones” – are less likely than others to notice religious
       activities in their schools. For instance, just 17% of unaffiliated
       teens say they sometimes or often see other students invite someone
       to worship services or a religious youth group, compared with
       three-in-ten Christian teens (31%) who commonly see this happen.
       These differences may reflect their circles of friends, the schools
       they attend, their attentiveness to religious behavior, or other
       factors.
     * About three-quarters of all religiously affiliated teens (78%)
       report that at least some of their friends share their religion. A
       smaller proportion (60%) of all religiously unaffiliated teens say
       they have friends who identify – like they do – as atheist,
       agnostic or nothing in particular. Indeed, 19% of unaffiliated
       teens say that none of their friends are religiously unaffiliated,
       and an additional 19% say that “hardly any” of their friends share
       their lack of religious affiliation.
     * Most American teens (64%) say they rarely or never discuss religion
       with their friends, and only 5% say they often engage in such
       discussions. Again, evangelical Protestants are much more likely
       than others to engage in this type of religious behavior; roughly
       six-in-ten evangelical teens say they sometimes (47%) or often
       (11%) talk to their friends about religion, compared with
       four-in-ten mainline Protestant teens, a third of Catholics and
       about one-in-five religious “nones” who at least sometimes discuss
       religion with friends.

   more likely than boys to talk to their friends about religion
     * Religion seems to play a somewhat larger role in friendships for
       adolescent girls than for boys. The survey shows that girls are
       more likely than boys to talk to their friends about religion (41%
       vs. 31%) and somewhat more likely to be religiously similar to most
       of their friends. Girls who attend public school also are more
       likely to notice when other students wear clothing or jewelry with
       religious symbols and to invite other students to their religious
       youth group or worship services. This reflects a broader pattern
       among adults: Women are generally more religious than men,
       particularly among Christians.
     * Just 1% of mainline Protestant teens say they have ever been teased
       or made fun of in school for their religion, compared with 9% of
       Catholic teens and 10% of evangelicals who say the same.

   The rest of this report explores findings from the survey’s questions
   about religion in school and among teenagers’ friendship circles in
   more detail, including analysis by religious group, age and grade
   level, race or ethnicity, gender, and geographic region.

Religion in school

Most teens surveyed attend public schools, fewer attend private schools or
are home-schooled

   One-in-ten evangelical Protestants are home-schooled The vast majority
   (87%) of teenagers surveyed say they attend public schools.^4 An
   additional 5% attend religious private schools, while 6% are
   home-schooled. Just 1% attend a nonreligious private school.^5

   However, the type of school adolescents attend tends to vary depending
   on their self-described religious background. Teens who describe
   themselves as evangelical Protestants are more likely to be
   home-schooled (11%) than “nones” (5%) and Catholics (2%). And, not
   surprisingly, teens with a religious affiliation (6%) are more likely
   than those without one (1%) to attend a religious private school. The
   survey indicates that Catholic teens are more likely than Protestant
   teens (9% vs. 4%) to attend a religious school.

   Most of the analyses in this report are limited to teenagers who attend
   a public school. When it comes to experiences with religion in a school
   environment, adolescents who attend religious schools or are
   home-schooled are much different from those who do not, and the survey
   did not include sufficiently large samples of students who attend
   religious private schools, or who are being home-schooled, to compare
   these groups with teenagers who go to public schools.^6

Most U.S. teens commonly see at least one type of religious expression in
public school

   Some religious expressions are relatively common in public schools. For
   instance, about half (53%) of U.S. teens in public schools often or
   sometimes see other students wearing clothing or jewelry with religious
   symbols, and four-in-ten (39%) regularly see students praying before a
   sporting event.

   Other religious activities and expressions are less common. A quarter
   of teens in public schools (26%) say they often or sometimes see
   students inviting other students to religious youth groups or worship
   services. About one-in-six (16%) regularly see other teens praying
   before lunch, and 8% often or sometimes see students reading religious
   scripture outside of class. This means that large majorities of U.S.
   teens rarely or never see these behaviors in school.

   On an index combining all five of these types of religious expression
   in school, about a third of teens (32%) say they rarely or never see
   any of them (or they did not answer the questions), while just 3% say
   they see all five on a regular basis. Another way to sum up their
   experiences: On the one hand, a majority of teens (68%) report seeing
   at least one of these religious expressions or activities in their
   public schools often or sometimes; on the other hand, fewer than half
   (41%) say they commonly see more than one of these religious behaviors.

   There are substantial differences in what students tend to see in
   public school depending on the student’s religious affiliation.
   Religiously affiliated teens are more likely than unaffiliated teens to
   say they at least sometimes see each of the five types of religious
   activities or expressions in school. There also are differences among
   religiously affiliated teens. For instance, Protestant teens (38%) are
   twice as likely as Catholic teens (19%) to say they see students
   inviting other students to youth group or worship services at least
   sometimes. And there are differences even among Protestants:
   Evangelical Protestant teens (18%) are twice as likely as mainline
   Protestants (8%) to say they regularly see their peers reading
   religious scripture in school.

   It is not completely clear what accounts for such large differences in
   what adolescents see in their schools. It is possible that the tendency
   to have religiously similar friendship circles (see here) affects what
   students see.^7 For example, religious teens – who tend to have friends
   who are similarly religious – may be exposed to more religious
   activities and expressions. But it’s also possible that religious and
   nonreligious teens may perceive the world somewhat differently: What
   may appear as a religious expression to an evangelical Protestant teen
   may not even be noticed by a nonreligious teen. Yet another factor is
   that certain groups are concentrated in parts of the country where
   religious expressions may be more (or less) common.

   Indeed, geographic region of residence is also associated with how
   likely teens are to witness religious activities and expressions in
   school. Teens in the South – where adults, on average, are more
   religious than in other regions – are particularly likely to report
   seeing religious expressions in school. About a quarter (23%) of
   Southern teens often or sometimes see other students praying before
   lunch, compared with 13% in the Northeast and 11% in both the Midwest
   and West.

   Public school students in the South also are more likely than those in
   other regions to report seeing students pray before sporting events and
   wear clothing or jewelry with religious symbols.

   There also are gender, age, and racial and ethnic differences in what
   adolescents experience in school. Girls are more likely than boys to
   see students wearing religious jewelry or clothing as well as more
   likely to see students inviting other students to religious services or
   youth group. Older adolescents are especially likely to say they
   “often” or “sometimes” see students pray before sporting events. And
   white (non-Hispanic) teens are more likely than nonwhite teens to see
   students inviting other students to youth groups or services.^8
   Unaffiliated teens tend to see fewer religious expressions and
   activities in school

   Aside from what they see in school, what are adolescents doing in
   school, religiously speaking?

   The survey asked religiously affiliated teens about their own religious
   practices and expressions in school. Among public school teens who
   identify with a religion, 31% say they at least sometimes wear clothing
   or jewelry with religious symbols, and about a quarter say they
   sometimes or often pray before lunch (26%) or invite other students to
   their worship services or a religious youth group (24%).^9 One-in-ten
   religiously affiliated teens say they regularly leave school for
   religious activities or programs.

   Evangelical Protestants stand out on some of these measures. Roughly
   four-in-ten evangelical Protestant teens who attend public school say
   they at least sometimes pray before lunch at school (39%), compared
   with 18% of Catholic teens and 11% of mainline Protestant teens.
   Similarly, about four-in-ten evangelical teens (43%) say they sometimes
   or often invite other students to their worship services or youth
   group, compared with 21% of mainline Protestants and 12% of Catholics
   who say they do this. Evangelical Protestant adolescents (38%) also are
   more likely than mainline Protestants (26%) to regularly wear religious
   clothing or jewelry.

   There are differences between boys and girls on some of these measures.
   While four-in-ten religiously affiliated girls (39%) sometimes or often
   wear religious jewelry or clothing, a quarter of religiously affiliated
   boys (25%) do so. This may be due to overall differences in the amount
   of jewelry that girls and boys wear; if girls wear jewelry more often
   than boys do in general, it stands to reason that they would also wear
   religious jewelry more often. But there also are gender differences
   when it comes to inviting fellow students to church or youth group:
   Nearly three-in-ten girls (28%) report that they sometimes or often
   invite others to their youth group or worship services, compared with
   one-in-five boys (20%).

   Religious activities and expressions in public schools vary by region,
   too. Religiously affiliated teens in the South (38%) are more likely
   than those in the Midwest (23%), West (20%) and Northeast (13%) to
   report praying before lunch at school. Southern teens (31%) also are
   more likely than teens in the West (21%) and Northeast (14%) to invite
   other students to their youth group or worship services.
   Evangelical Protestant teens most likely to pray before lunch and
   invite others to church or youth group

Most teens do not have religious support groups in school

   Most U.S. teens say there are no religious support or prayer groups
   that meet in their school The vast majority of U.S. teens who attend
   public schools say there is no religious support group or prayer group
   that meets in their school (82%). Nearly one-in-five teens say that
   religious support or prayer groups do meet in their schools (17%),
   including 5% who say they have participated in such a group in the last
   year and 12% who have not done so.

   Among Protestant teens, roughly three-in-ten (31%) say that a religious
   support group or prayer group meets in their school. But far fewer
   Catholics and religious “nones” say the same: Only about one-in-ten
   Catholic and unaffiliated teens report that their school hosts such a
   group.^10

   Unaffiliated teens also are highly unlikely to attend a support group,
   with fewer than 1% saying they have done so in the past year (the
   question was intended to capture nonreligious groups as well, such as
   the Secular Student Alliance). Protestant teens are somewhat more
   likely than their Catholic peers to participate in religious or prayer
   groups in school (11% vs 6%).

   Teens’ awareness of, and attendance at, religious support or prayer
   groups at their school also varies by region, with teens in the South
   more likely to say that prayer or religious support groups meet in
   their public school and that they, personally, participate in such
   activities, compared with those in the Northeast and West. Still, just
   9% of Southern teens who go to public school say that in the past year
   they have attended a prayer group or religious support group (such as
   the Fellowship of Christian Athletes) that meets in their school.

Religion in the classroom relatively rare

   About one-in-ten Southern teens in public schools say teacher has led
   prayer Relatively few U.S. teens in public schools report that they
   have ever seen teachers either lead a class in prayer (8%) or read from
   the Bible as an example of literature (8%).^11

   Protestant teens (11%) are more likely than unaffiliated teens (5%) to
   report that a teacher has led their class in prayer, and to report that
   a teacher has read from the Bible as an example of literature (12% vs.
   4%).

   Adolescents’ reports of teachers’ religious activities in the classroom
   also vary by race and ethnicity and region. Nonwhite teens are more
   likely than white (non-Hispanic) teens to say a teacher has led their
   class in prayer (11% vs. 5%) and read from the Bible as literature (12%
   vs. 6%). And teens in the South are especially likely to say a teacher
   has led their class in prayer (12%) and read from the Bible (13%) when
   compared with the small shares of teens in the Northeast who report the
   same (2% and 3%, respectively).

   Gender, age and grade are not associated with having seen teachers lead
   a class in prayer or read from the Bible as literature.

   Evangelical Protestant teens most likely to approve of teacher leading
   a class in prayer What do students in public schools think about
   teachers leading a class in prayer or reading from the Bible as an
   example of literature?

   About four-in-ten (41%) say they think it is appropriate for a teacher
   in their school to lead a class in prayer, and 55% say it is
   appropriate for a teacher to read from the Bible as an example of
   literature. But there are large differences by religion.

   Among those in public schools, religiously affiliated students (49%)
   are about twice as likely as religious “nones” (25%) to think it is
   acceptable for a teacher to lead a class in prayer. Affiliated
   adolescents also are more likely than “nones” to think it is acceptable
   for a teacher to read from the Bible as literature (62% vs. 42%).

   There are large differences among religiously affiliated adolescents as
   well. For instance, six-in-ten Protestants approve of a teacher leading
   a class in prayer, compared with four-in-ten Catholics who say this.
   Evangelical Protestants are especially likely to approve of teachers
   bringing religion into the classroom: Two-thirds of evangelical
   Protestant teens (68%) say it is appropriate for a teacher to lead a
   class in prayer, compared with four-in-ten mainline Protestants (41%).
   Roughly eight-in-ten evangelical Protestant teens approve of a teacher
   reading from the Bible as an example of literature (82%), compared with
   six-in-ten mainline Protestant teens who say this (59%).

   Views toward teachers bringing religion into the classroom also vary
   across racial and ethnic groups, regions, and grade levels. Nonwhite
   teens are more supportive of teachers praying: 46% of nonwhite teens
   think it is appropriate for teachers in public schools to lead a class
   in prayer, while 36% of non-Hispanic white teens think so. But there
   are no differences between white and nonwhite teens in views toward
   teachers reading from the Bible as an example of literature.

   Teens in the South and Midwest are particularly likely to approve of
   teachers praying and reading from the Bible in class. About half (55%)
   of Southern teens in public schools say it is appropriate for a teacher
   to lead a class in prayer. By comparison, three-in-ten teens in the
   West (30%) and Northeast (28%) think it is acceptable for a teacher to
   lead a class in prayer. There is a similar pattern on the question
   about teachers reading the Bible as literature.

   Teens who have been in school for more years are less supportive of
   teachers praying in the classroom. Nearly half (47%) of pre-high school
   teens think it is appropriate for a teacher to lead a class in prayer,
   compared with 37% of those in 11th and 12th grades.

   Most teens in public schools know their teachers are not permitted to
   lead a class in prayer The survey also asked teens what they know about
   the U.S. Supreme Court’s stance on teacher-led prayer, finding that
   those in 8th grade or lower are more likely than those in 9th through
   12th grades to incorrectly say that the court permits the practice (20%
   vs. 14%).

   Overall, most U.S. teens in public schools (82%) know that their
   teachers are not permitted to lead a class in prayer, according to
   rulings by the U.S. Supreme Court. At the same time, 16% think this is
   legally allowed – although this is much smaller than the share who
   think it would be appropriate (41%). Among just those who say
   teacher-led prayer is appropriate, a somewhat higher share believe it
   is permitted by law (28%), but 70% still know that it is
   unconstitutional.

   U.S. teens are much less familiar with the law when it comes to reading
   from the Bible as an example of literature, which the Supreme Court has
   ruled permissible. About a third (36%) of U.S. teens in public school
   know that their teachers are permitted to do this, while six-in-ten
   (62%) think it is not allowed.

   Evangelical Protestant teens stand out from other traditions on this
   measure: 47% know that public school teachers are allowed to read from
   the Bible as literature, compared with about a third each of mainline
   Protestant teens (34%), religious “nones” (33%) and Catholics (32%).

   In contrast with the question about teacher-led prayer, teens in 11th
   and 12th grades are less likely to correctly answer this question than
   those in eighth grade or lower.

   There are no statistically significant differences across regions on
   either of these questions.

Relatively few teens witness religion-related bullying in schools

   Majority of teens regularly witness bullying at school To further
   explore what teens are encountering in their schools, the survey asked
   about experiences with teasing, bullying and being subject to
   unfriendly comments. The analyses of bullying and hostility toward
   religion in school include students in both religious and nonreligious
   schools (but not those who are home-schooled). ^12

   Many educators, parents, and researchers have pointed out that bullying
   is a major concern in U.S. schools, and the new survey finds that 54%
   of U.S. teens report regularly seeing students in their school being
   teased or made fun of – including 16% who say they often see this and
   38% who sometimes see it. About three-in-ten say they rarely witness
   bullying in school, while 14% say they never see it.

   Christians and religious “nones,” boys and girls, and older and younger
   teens are all about equally likely to witness bullying in school. Teens
   who live in the Midwest (59%) and the South (58%) are somewhat more
   likely than those in the West (46%) to say they see other students
   being teased or made fun of in school with any regularity. But, on the
   whole, there is little variation in how often students in these various
   demographic categories report witnessing bullying.

   Most teens rarely or never witness religiously motivated bullying in
   their school While many teens in both public and private schools
   observe bullying in their school, fewer say that they see other
   students being teased or made fun of because of their religion,
   specifically. In fact, six-in-ten (58%) say they never witness this
   type of behavior, and 28% say they rarely see it. One-in-ten say that
   they sometimes see religiously motivated bullying in their school
   (11%), and 2% see this often.

   On this question, mainline Protestants stand out from other religious
   groups as being the least likely to say that they regularly see
   religious bullying in their school. Just 3% say they witness this
   behavior at least sometimes, compared with 11% among religious “nones,”
   13% among Catholic teens and 17% among evangelicals. Evangelical teens
   are the least likely to say that they never see religious bullying in
   their school (48%).

   Across many demographic groups, most school-attending teens rarely, if
   ever, see other students being bullied for their religion. There are
   virtually no differences between boys and girls, younger and older
   teens, or across regions on this question.

   Few teens subject to religious bullying in their school Among public or
   private school students who are affiliated with a religious tradition,
   roughly one-in-ten say that they, personally, have ever been teased or
   made fun of in school because of their religion.^13

   Just 1% of mainline Protestant teens say they have ever been bullied in
   school for their religion, compared with 10% of evangelicals and 9% of
   Catholic teens who say the same.

   There are few discernible differences on this question among
   religiously affiliated teens by gender, age, and race and ethnicity.
   Roughly one-in-ten or fewer in each demographic group say they have
   personally been teased or made fun of in school because of their
   religion.

   Unaffiliated teens were asked a similar question about being teased for
   their lack of religion.  Among students who identify religiously as
   atheist, agnostic or “nothing in particular,” very few (4%) say they
   have personally experienced bullying in school because they are not
   religious.

   About one-in-ten affiliated, unaffiliated teens say other students have
   been unfriendly to their religious beliefs The survey also asked teens
   whether other students have been “unfriendly” to their religious or
   spiritual views. Those who said “yes” then had the opportunity to
   explain, in their own words, how this has occurred, with the goal of
   getting more details about any religiously motivated bullying that
   teens may be facing in school.

   Overall, about one-in-ten of all school-attending adolescents report
   that other students have been unfriendly toward their religious views.
   And they give a wide range of responses to demonstrate just what they
   are experiencing from their peers.

   Some religiously affiliated students say they have been bullied for
   their religious beliefs (3%). They report some general examples, such
   as other students “making fun of my religion,” “they make fun of me
   going to church” or “they think I attend church too much.” Other teens
   give examples of more specific comments they have experienced, such as
   “someone told me that they used to think I was intelligent until they
   found out I believed in God” and “[they] made fun of Catholics.”

   A similar share of religiously unaffiliated students (4%) give examples
   of how they feel bullied for their lack of religious beliefs. They
   report that their peers “[say] that I was the reason the country is
   going downhill” and that “they say I’ll go to hell for not believing in
   [G]od.”

   Equally small shares of both affiliated and unaffiliated teens (1%
   each) note that they have lost friends or felt distanced from former
   friends due to different beliefs.

   Few teens have experienced teachers being unfriendly to their religion
   School-attending teens are slightly less likely to say that teachers
   have been unfriendly toward their religious or spiritual views than
   they are to say the same about other students (5% vs. 9%). Those who
   report that they have experienced this type of behavior by a teacher
   cite a variety of circumstances and ways in which it has happened.

   Some teens who belong to a religion offer responses that indicate a
   teacher challenged the students’ religious beliefs, including
   questioning a student’s intelligence (2%). These teens report
   experiences such as, “I had a life science teacher once talk for 30
   minutes about why religion is stupid and a joke” and “they’ve made fun
   of me and not supported me in going to my before school scripture study
   class.”

   At the other end of the spectrum, some teens who identify as religious
   “nones” report animosity toward their views from teachers who the teens
   perceive as promoting their own beliefs (2%). One student recalls a
   teacher “posting pro Christianity posters in [the] classroom, making
   negative comments about those who don’t worship Christianity.” Another
   says: “A few teachers kinda force me to believe that [G]od is real.”

   One-in-ten teenage students report teachers making them uncomfortable
   with comments about religion The survey also asked students a more
   general question: Has a teacher ever said anything about religion that
   made you feel uncomfortable? About one-in-ten students say they have
   experienced this type of discomfort in their schools, with some small
   distinctions between those who have a religion and those who do not.

   Some religiously affiliated students share examples of teachers
   challenging religious beliefs, even if they were not personally
   challenging the respondent: “[The teachers said] that God was make
   believe and religion was to control the masses” and “taught us multiple
   religions as if they were all true.” At the same time, some students
   who identify as religious “nones” note their discomfort when they
   perceive teachers as promoting particular religious beliefs. For
   instance, one teen reports that teachers have “brought the [Ten
   Commandments] to class and preached.” Some expound on why a teacher’s
   comments were unacceptable: “This teacher was heavily promoting having
   a relationship with God as being the most important thing in life and I
   didn’t think that was appropriate to express while teaching an
   unrelated subject.”

Teenage friendships and religion

   Affiliated teens more likely to have religiously similar friends
   According to sociologists, religion is usually a social phenomenon,
   taking place among a community of believers.^14 People affect – and are
   affected by – the religious and spiritual beliefs and activities of
   their friends and family. Contemporary research points to the idea that
   social interactions promote and maintain religious worldviews.^15 And
   among teenagers, too, there is evidence that the friendships
   adolescents form in school influence their religious trajectories.^16

   Indeed, most teens have at least some friends who share their religion
   (or lack thereof). Overall, only about a quarter (27%) say that “hardly
   any” or “none” of their friends share their religion – or, in the case
   of unaffiliated respondents, that “hardly any” or “none” of their
   friends are atheist, agnostic, or have no particular religion.
   Three-in-ten teens report that most or all of their friends share their
   religion, and even more (43%) say some of their friends share their
   religious identity.

   There is good reason to expect that this should vary by religion. Most
   Americans identify as Christians of some kind, meaning it may be harder
   for nonreligious adolescents to find friends who are like them,
   religiously. That is borne out by the data: Religiously affiliated
   teens as a whole are roughly twice as likely as religious “nones” (36%
   vs. 16%) to report that most or all of their friends share their
   religion (or lack thereof). About four-in-ten unaffiliated teens (38%)
   say that hardly any or none of their friends are, like them, atheist,
   agnostic or “nothing in particular” when it comes to religion.

   Among adults, some religious groups are more likely than others to have
   friendship networks that reflect their own beliefs or affiliations.^17
   Protestants, for example, are overall less likely than Catholics,
   members of non-Christian faiths and religious “nones” to have
   interreligious social connections. But, unlike adults, Protestant
   adolescents are no more likely than Catholic teens to say that most or
   all of their friends share their religion.^18

   Aside from religious affiliation, region, age and grade play few, if
   any, statistically significant roles in the religious makeup of
   adolescents’ social networks. But gender is a factor. A third of girls
   (33%) report that most or all of their friends share their religious
   identity, making them moderately more likely than boys (27%) to be in
   that situation.

Most teens do not regularly talk to friends about religion

   Evangelical Protestant teens especially likely to talk to friends about
   religion For most teens, religion is not a regular topic of
   conversation with friends. Roughly two-thirds (64%) say they rarely or
   never talk to their friends about religion. Still, a sizable minority
   of American teenagers (36%) say they sometimes or often talk with
   friends about religion.

   Not surprisingly, religious teens are particularly likely to engage in
   these kinds of discussions. Almost half (45%) of religiously affiliated
   teens report that they regularly (that is, “sometimes” or “often”) talk
   to their friends about religion. Conversely, only 17% of unaffiliated
   teens at least sometimes talk to their friends about religion.

   But there also are differences among religiously affiliated teens. A
   majority of evangelical Protestant teens (58%) regularly talk to their
   friends about religion, compared with about four-in-ten mainline
   Protestant teens (39%) and roughly a third of Catholics (35%).

   In addition to religious affiliation, gender and region also are
   related factors. Four-in-ten girls (41%) report sometimes or often
   talking to their friends about religion; just three-in-ten boys (31%)
   say the same.

   Adolescents in the South are particularly likely to talk to their
   friends about religion. About four-in-ten Southern teens (41%) report
   doing so at least sometimes, while smaller shares in the West (31%) and
   Northeast (29%) say the same.

   There are fewer differences across age, grade, and race and ethnicity
   in how frequently teens report talking with friends about religion.
    1. Teens were asked if they have ever had a teacher lead their class
       in prayer, not just in their current school. It is possible that
       some teens who have experienced teacher-led prayer and now attend
       public schools may have attended other types of schools (for
       example, private school or home school) in the past and experienced
       teacher-led prayer in those places, which is not a violation of the
       Constitution. ↩
    2. A small share (3%) of teenage public school students did not answer
       one or both of these questions on teacher-led prayer. ↩
    3. Religion and American Public Education: Conservative Religious
       Agendas and the U.S. Constitution.” Education and Urban Society.
       Also see Cheadle, Jacob E. and Philip Schwadel. 2012. “The
       ‘Friendship Dynamics of Religion,’ or the ‘Religious Dynamics of
       Friendship’? A Social Network Analysis of Adolescents Who Attend
       Small Schools.” Social Science Research. ↩
    4. The figures for teens who attend public school here and throughout
       the report include those who say they attend charter or magnet
       schools. ↩
    5. According to 2019 estimates from the National Center for Education
       Statistics (NCES), 9% of high school students enrolled in school
       (not counting home-schooled students) are in private schools. In
       the survey sample, 5% of high school students enrolled in schools
       are in private schools. It is more difficult to calculate a
       national estimate for those who are home-schooled because U.S.
       states vary in their laws around reporting home-schooling
       statistics. Nonetheless, the NCES estimates that 4% of high
       school-aged adolescents in the U.S. were home-schooled in 2016, the
       most recent year for which the estimates are available. ↩
    6. An additional reason for this analytical decision is to avoid
       conflating the associations between adolescent characteristics and
       religious experiences in schools with the type of school teens
       attend. For example, Catholic teens who attend Catholic schools are
       presumably much more likely to experience prayer and other
       religious activities in school, which would disproportionately
       affect the Catholic figures in the analysis. See Uecker, Jeremy E.
       2008. “Alternative Schooling Strategies and the Religious Lives of
       American Adolescents.” Journal for the Scientific Study of
       Religion. ↩
    7. For a discussion of Americans’ tendency to have friends who are
       religiously like themselves, see McPherson, Miller, Lynn
       Smith-Lovin and James M. Cook. 2001. “Birds of a Feather: Homophily
       in Social Networks.” Annual Review of Sociology. ↩
    8. The net nonwhite category includes teens who identify as black,
       Asian, Hispanic, some other race, or multiple races. It is the unit
       of analysis in this survey because the sample sizes for most of the
       nonwhite categories are too small to analyze individually. The
       combined category is used in this report so that broad comparisons
       can be made to highlight differences between groups. Researchers
       prefer to break out subgroups when possible to show the differences
       that may exist between groups of people. The use of a net nonwhite
       category is not intended to obscure the fact that the religious
       experiences and behaviors of black Americans, Hispanic Americans,
       and Americans of other races and ethnicities may be quite
       different. ↩
    9. The survey did not ask teens specifically how they pray before
       lunch, therefore this practice could include everything from prayer
       with a public component (for example, prayers said aloud or prayers
       preceded by or followed by the sign of the cross) to private
       prayers that students pray silently. ↩
   10. This question was asked of both religiously affiliated and
       unaffiliated teens and included examples of religious groups (for
       example, the Fellowship of Christian Athletes) and nonreligious
       groups (the question referenced the “Secular Student Association”)
       under the broader umbrella of religious support or prayer groups. ↩
   11. Teens were asked if they have ever had a teacher lead their class
       in prayer, not just in their current school. It is possible that
       some teens who have experienced teacher-led prayer and now attend
       public schools may have attended other types of schools (for
       example, private school or home school) in the past and experienced
       teacher-led prayer in those places, which is not a violation of the
       Constitution. ↩
   12. The analyses here are expanded to include private schools because
       research shows that bullying is not limited to public schools. And,
       even when examining religiously motivated bullying, there are not
       the same concerns about conflating the type of school a teen
       attends (e.g. religious private school) with the potential types of
       unfriendliness toward religion that he or she may experience in
       that setting. See Choy, Susan P. 1997. “Public and Private Schools:
       How Do They Differ?” National Center for Education Statistics. ↩
   13. Much of the research on religion-related bullying focuses on
       minority religions, such as Judaism and Islam in the United States.
       This report, however, does not analyze responses from Jewish or
       Muslim teens separately due to insufficient sample sizes. Jewish
       and Muslim teens (and those from other religious groups) are
       included in the full sample and in the analysis of religiously
       affiliated teens. See Dupper, David R., Shandra Forrest-Bank and
       Autumn Lowry-Carusillo. 2015. “Experiences of Religious Minorities
       in Public School Settings: Findings from Focus Groups Involving
       Muslim, Jewish, Catholic, and Unitarian Universalist Youths.”
       Children & Schools. ↩
   14. The social nature of religion is a key theme in social scientific
       research. This is perhaps most famously associated with the work of
       the sociologist Emile Durkheim. Durkheim argued that interaction
       among co-religionists creates and reinforces religion by fostering
       solidarity through the creation and veneration of shared symbols.
       See Durkheim, Emile. 1912. “The Elementary Forms of the Religious
       Life.” ↩
   15. Stroope, Samuel. 2012. “Social Networks and Religion: The Role of
       Congregational Social Embeddedness in Religious Belief and
       Practice.” Sociology of Religion. ↩
   16. Cheadle, Jacob E. and Philip Schwadel. 2012. “The ‘Friendship
       Dynamics of Religion,’ or the ‘Religious Dynamics of Friendship’? A
       Social Network Analysis of Adolescents Who Attend Small Schools.”
       Social Science Research. ↩
   17. Smith, Christian. 1998. “American Evangelicalism: Embattled and
       Thriving.” ↩
   18. For the research on interreligious social connections by religious
       group, see Scheitle, Christopher P. and Buster G. Smith. 2011. “A
       Note on the Frequency and Sources of Close Interreligious Ties.”
       Journal for the Scientific Study of Religion. ↩

Pagination

   Next: Acknowledgments Next Page → ← Prev Page
    1. You are reading page 1
    2. Page 2
    3. Page 3

Report Materials

     * Complete Report PDF
     * Topline
     * Appendix A: Detailed tables
     * Essay: Religion in Public Schools

Table of Contents

     * Overview
          + Religion in school
          + Relatively few teens witness religion-related bullying in
            schools
          + Teenage friendships and religion
     * Acknowledgments
     * Methodology

Related

   PublicationsOct 3, 2019

Religion in the Public Schools

   PublicationsJul 23, 2019

What Americans Know About Religion

   PublicationsJul 15, 2019

A Closer Look at How Religious Restrictions Have Risen Around the World

   PublicationsJun 11, 2019

Americans See Catholic Clergy Sex Abuse as an Ongoing Problem

   PublicationsApr 30, 2019

In Western European Countries With Church Taxes, Support for the Tradition
Remains Strong

Topics

     * Religion and Society
     * Education
     * Teens and Youth

Popular On Pew Research

   Fact Tank01/17/2019

Defining generations: Where Millennials end and Generation Z begins

   Fact Tank09/06/2018

Are you in the American middle class? Find out with our income calculator

   Fact Tank11/28/2018

5 facts about illegal immigration in the U.S.

   Internet & Tech03/01/2018

Social Media Use in 2018

   Social Trends01/17/2019

Generation Z Looks a Lot Like Millennials on Key Social and Political Issues

   Get Pew Research Center data by email ____________________ Signup

   Pew Research Center 1615 L St. NW, Suite 800 Washington, DC 20036 USA
   (+1) 202-419-4300 | Main (+1) 202-419-4349 | Fax (+1) 202-419-4372 |
   Media Inquiries

Research Areas

     * U.S. Politics & Policy
     * Journalism & Media
     * Internet & Technology
     * Science & Society
     * Religion & Public Life
     * Hispanic Trends
     * Global Attitudes & Trends
     * Social & Demographic Trends

Follow Us

     * Email Newsletters
     * Facebook
     * Twitter
     * Tumblr
     * YouTube
     * RSS

   About Pew Research Center Pew Research Center is a nonpartisan fact
   tank that informs the public about the issues, attitudes and trends
   shaping the world. It conducts public opinion polling, demographic
   research, media content analysis and other empirical social science
   research. Pew Research Center does not take policy positions. It is a
   subsidiary of The Pew Charitable Trusts.

     * Copyright 2019 Pew Research Center
     * About
     * Terms & Conditions
     * Privacy Policy
     * Reprints, Permissions & Use Policy
     * Feedback
     * Careers

   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-N8242V9
   #Pew Research Center's Religion & Public Life Project RSS Feed
   alternate alternate JSON Representation Prism XML Version Plain Text
   Version

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MVFJNW

   Numbers, Facts and Trends Shaping Your World

   About Follow
   My Account
   Log in View Account Log out
   Donate

   Pew Research Center

   Religion & Public Life
     * Menu
     * Research Areas

     * Home
     * U.S. Politics
     * Media & News
     * Social Trends
     * Religion
     * Internet & Tech
     * Science
     * Hispanics
     * Global
     * Methods

     * Publications
     * Topics
     * Interactives
     * Data and Resources
     * Experts

   October 3, 2019

For a Lot of American Teens, Religion Is a Regular Part of the Public School
Day

   Yet many other U.S. adolescents rarely observe religious behavior in
   their schools, and a majority say they rarely or never discuss religion
   with friends
   (Lewis Geyer/Digital First Media/Boulder Daily Camera via Getty Images)

   Religion in public schools has long been a controversial issue. The
   U.S. Supreme Court ruled in 1962 that teachers and administrators
   cannot lead prayers in public schools, and a decision in 2000 barred
   school districts from sponsoring student-led prayers at football games.
   At the same time, the court has held that students retain a First
   Amendment right to the free exercise of religion and may voluntarily
   pray before, during and after school. Where exactly to draw the line
   between constitutionally protected religious activity and impermissible
   state-sponsored religious indoctrination remains under dispute. This
   year, the Supreme Court declined to hear a case involving a high school
   coach who was fired for leading prayer after games, just one of several
   recent controversies in this area of law.

   While periodic battles continue in the courts, what is the day-to-day
   experience of students in public schools across the country? A new Pew
   Research Center survey asked a nationally representative sample of more
   than 1,800 teenagers (ages 13 to 17) about the kinds of religious
   activity they engage in – or see other students engaging in – during
   the course of the school day.

   The survey finds that about four-in-ten teens who attend public schools
   say they commonly (either “often” or “sometimes”) see other students
   praying before sporting events at school. This includes about half of
   teenage public schoolers who live in the South, where students are more
   likely than those in other regions to witness and partake in various
   religious expressions at school.

   Clothing and jewelry are most common forms of religious expression seen
   in public schools In addition, roughly half of U.S. teens who attend
   public school say they commonly see other students in their school
   wearing religious clothing (such as an Islamic headscarf) or jewelry
   with religious symbols (such as a necklace with a Christian cross or a
   Jewish Star of David).

   Four-in-ten U.S. teens see at least two of these five types of
   religious expression on a regular basis About a quarter of teens who
   attend public schools say they often or sometimes see students invite
   other students to religious youth groups or worship services. About
   one-in-six (16%) often or sometimes see other students praying before
   lunch in their public school. And 8% report that they commonly see
   other teenagers reading religious scripture outside of class during the
   school day.

   Overall, on an index combining these five types of religious
   expressions and activities by fellow students – wearing religious
   clothing or jewelry, praying before a sporting event, inviting other
   students to youth groups or services, praying before eating lunch, and
   reading religious scripture during the school day – 8% of teens in
   public schools say they commonly see all five (3%) or four out of five
   (5%). A third of students say they often or sometimes see two (20%) or
   three (13%) of these forms of religious expression in their public
   school, while 26% say they commonly see just one. And a third of public
   school teens (32%) say they rarely or never see any of these religious
   expressions by fellow students (or they did not answer the questions).
   Among teens in public schools in the South, 12% say teacher has ever
   led a class in prayer


   The survey also asked about two kinds of teacher-led, classroom
   activities. It finds that 8% of public school students say they have
   ever had a teacher lead their class in prayer – an action that the
   courts have ruled is a violation of the Establishment Clause of the
   Constitution.^1 An identical share (8%) say they have had a teacher
   read from the Bible as an example of literature, which the courts have
   said is fine. Both of these experiences are more common in the South
   (where 12% of public school students say a teacher has led their class
   in prayer, and 13% say a teacher has read to them from the Bible as
   literature) than in the Northeast (where just 2% say a teacher has lead
   them in prayer, and 3% say a teacher has read from the Bible as an
   example of literature).

   Nationwide, roughly four-in-ten teens (including 68% of evangelical
   Protestant teens) who go to public school say they think it is
   “appropriate” for a teacher to lead a class in prayer. Some of the
   teens who express this view are unaware of the Supreme Court’s ruling.
   But most know what the law is; 82% of U.S. teens in public schools (and
   79% of evangelical teens) correctly answer a factual question about the
   constitutionality of teacher-led prayer in public school classrooms.
   Just 16% of teens incorrectly believe that teacher-led prayer is
   allowed by law, far fewer than the 41% who say it is “appropriate.”

   Put another way, roughly half of teens who attend public school (53%)
   know that teacher-led prayer is prohibited and also find the practice
   inappropriate. At the same time, roughly three-in-ten (29%) know that
   it is unconstitutional but say that it is appropriate for a public
   school teacher to lead a class in prayer. Smaller shares think that
   teacher-led prayer is both legally permitted and appropriate (11%) or
   that it is permitted but inappropriate (4%).^2 A quarter of religiously
   affiliated teens say they sometimes or often pray before lunch in
   public school

   In addition to asking about what they have seen in school, the survey
   also asked teens who identify with a religion and attend a public
   school whether they personally participate in religious expressions in
   their school. Roughly three-in-ten or fewer say they regularly wear
   jewelry or clothing with religious symbols, pray before lunch, invite
   other students to worship services or a youth group, or leave school
   during the day to participate in religious activities.

   To be sure, some religiously affiliated public school students do many
   of these four things on a regular basis: 12% say they sometimes or
   often participate in three or more of these religious expressions at
   school. But roughly half (49%) of the students surveyed say they rarely
   or never participate in any of these religious expressions during the
   school day, or they did not answer the questions. In addition, only 5%
   of all public school students say that there is a religious support or
   prayer group that meets in their school and that they have taken part
   in it in the past year. The vast majority say that as far as they know,
   there is no such group in their school.

   An experience that is more common in American schools – both public and
   private – is bullying. The majority of U.S. teens surveyed say they
   either “often” (16%) or “sometimes” (38%) see students in their school
   being teased or made fun of. But this is rarely for religious reasons:
   Just 13% say they regularly see fellow students being teased because of
   their religion, and even fewer say they have directly experienced
   religiously motivated bullying. Overall, teens are far more likely to
   say they “rarely” or “never” see this type of bullying than they are to
   report that they sometimes or often witness such behavior.

   At the same time, roughly one-in-ten teens in public and private
   schools (9%) say that other students have made comments that are
   unfriendly to their personal religious or spiritual views, and 5% say
   that teachers have made such comments.

   These are among the key findings of a survey of 1,811 U.S. adolescents
   ages 13 to 17, conducted online from March 29 to April 14, 2019. The
   survey was administered using the Ipsos KnowledgePanel and asked
   questions of both a teenager and one of their parents; this report
   focuses on the responses of the teens. For more information on how this
   survey was conducted, see the Methodology.

   While several previous surveys have examined the religious lives of
   teenagers, this is the first large-scale, nationally representative
   survey asking teens a series of questions about their own practices and
   perceptions regarding religious expressions in public schools.

   This topic is important to the broader study of religion in American
   society because of the friendships adolescents form in their classes
   and the way they experience religion in public spaces during some of
   their most formative years.^3

   Evangelical Protestant teens most likely to pray at lunch and invite
   others to church or youth group The survey included teens from many
   religious backgrounds, including non-Christian faiths, such as Judaism,
   Islam, Buddhism and Hinduism. However, the sample of 1,811 teens did
   not include enough teens in those religious groups – or in some of the
   smaller Christian traditions, such as the Church of Jesus Christ of
   Latter-day Saints (sometimes called Mormons) or the historically black
   Protestant tradition – to allow their views to be analyzed and reported
   separately. The sample size is sufficient, though, to allow separate
   analysis of Catholic, evangelical Protestant, mainline Protestant and
   religiously unaffiliated teens.

   Other findings in this report include:
     * Teens who identify as evangelical Protestants are much more likely
       than Catholics and mainline Protestants to participate in religious
       activities in their public school, such as praying before lunch or
       inviting other students to their worship services or a religious
       youth group. For example, among teens who attend public schools,
       39% of evangelical Protestants say they sometimes or often pray
       before lunch, compared with 18% of Catholics and 11% of mainline
       Protestants who say they do this.
     * Teens with no religious affiliation – those who identify as
       atheist, agnostic or “nothing in particular,” sometimes called
       religious “nones” – are less likely than others to notice religious
       activities in their schools. For instance, just 17% of unaffiliated
       teens say they sometimes or often see other students invite someone
       to worship services or a religious youth group, compared with
       three-in-ten Christian teens (31%) who commonly see this happen.
       These differences may reflect their circles of friends, the schools
       they attend, their attentiveness to religious behavior, or other
       factors.
     * About three-quarters of all religiously affiliated teens (78%)
       report that at least some of their friends share their religion. A
       smaller proportion (60%) of all religiously unaffiliated teens say
       they have friends who identify – like they do – as atheist,
       agnostic or nothing in particular. Indeed, 19% of unaffiliated
       teens say that none of their friends are religiously unaffiliated,
       and an additional 19% say that “hardly any” of their friends share
       their lack of religious affiliation.
     * Most American teens (64%) say they rarely or never discuss religion
       with their friends, and only 5% say they often engage in such
       discussions. Again, evangelical Protestants are much more likely
       than others to engage in this type of religious behavior; roughly
       six-in-ten evangelical teens say they sometimes (47%) or often
       (11%) talk to their friends about religion, compared with
       four-in-ten mainline Protestant teens, a third of Catholics and
       about one-in-five religious “nones” who at least sometimes discuss
       religion with friends.

   more likely than boys to talk to their friends about religion
     * Religion seems to play a somewhat larger role in friendships for
       adolescent girls than for boys. The survey shows that girls are
       more likely than boys to talk to their friends about religion (41%
       vs. 31%) and somewhat more likely to be religiously similar to most
       of their friends. Girls who attend public school also are more
       likely to notice when other students wear clothing or jewelry with
       religious symbols and to invite other students to their religious
       youth group or worship services. This reflects a broader pattern
       among adults: Women are generally more religious than men,
       particularly among Christians.
     * Just 1% of mainline Protestant teens say they have ever been teased
       or made fun of in school for their religion, compared with 9% of
       Catholic teens and 10% of evangelicals who say the same.

   The rest of this report explores findings from the survey’s questions
   about religion in school and among teenagers’ friendship circles in
   more detail, including analysis by religious group, age and grade
   level, race or ethnicity, gender, and geographic region.

Religion in school

Most teens surveyed attend public schools, fewer attend private schools or
are home-schooled

   One-in-ten evangelical Protestants are home-schooled The vast majority
   (87%) of teenagers surveyed say they attend public schools.^4 An
   additional 5% attend religious private schools, while 6% are
   home-schooled. Just 1% attend a nonreligious private school.^5

   However, the type of school adolescents attend tends to vary depending
   on their self-described religious background. Teens who describe
   themselves as evangelical Protestants are more likely to be
   home-schooled (11%) than “nones” (5%) and Catholics (2%). And, not
   surprisingly, teens with a religious affiliation (6%) are more likely
   than those without one (1%) to attend a religious private school. The
   survey indicates that Catholic teens are more likely than Protestant
   teens (9% vs. 4%) to attend a religious school.

   Most of the analyses in this report are limited to teenagers who attend
   a public school. When it comes to experiences with religion in a school
   environment, adolescents who attend religious schools or are
   home-schooled are much different from those who do not, and the survey
   did not include sufficiently large samples of students who attend
   religious private schools, or who are being home-schooled, to compare
   these groups with teenagers who go to public schools.^6

Most U.S. teens commonly see at least one type of religious expression in
public school

   Some religious expressions are relatively common in public schools. For
   instance, about half (53%) of U.S. teens in public schools often or
   sometimes see other students wearing clothing or jewelry with religious
   symbols, and four-in-ten (39%) regularly see students praying before a
   sporting event.

   Other religious activities and expressions are less common. A quarter
   of teens in public schools (26%) say they often or sometimes see
   students inviting other students to religious youth groups or worship
   services. About one-in-six (16%) regularly see other teens praying
   before lunch, and 8% often or sometimes see students reading religious
   scripture outside of class. This means that large majorities of U.S.
   teens rarely or never see these behaviors in school.

   On an index combining all five of these types of religious expression
   in school, about a third of teens (32%) say they rarely or never see
   any of them (or they did not answer the questions), while just 3% say
   they see all five on a regular basis. Another way to sum up their
   experiences: On the one hand, a majority of teens (68%) report seeing
   at least one of these religious expressions or activities in their
   public schools often or sometimes; on the other hand, fewer than half
   (41%) say they commonly see more than one of these religious behaviors.

   There are substantial differences in what students tend to see in
   public school depending on the student’s religious affiliation.
   Religiously affiliated teens are more likely than unaffiliated teens to
   say they at least sometimes see each of the five types of religious
   activities or expressions in school. There also are differences among
   religiously affiliated teens. For instance, Protestant teens (38%) are
   twice as likely as Catholic teens (19%) to say they see students
   inviting other students to youth group or worship services at least
   sometimes. And there are differences even among Protestants:
   Evangelical Protestant teens (18%) are twice as likely as mainline
   Protestants (8%) to say they regularly see their peers reading
   religious scripture in school.

   It is not completely clear what accounts for such large differences in
   what adolescents see in their schools. It is possible that the tendency
   to have religiously similar friendship circles (see here) affects what
   students see.^7 For example, religious teens – who tend to have friends
   who are similarly religious – may be exposed to more religious
   activities and expressions. But it’s also possible that religious and
   nonreligious teens may perceive the world somewhat differently: What
   may appear as a religious expression to an evangelical Protestant teen
   may not even be noticed by a nonreligious teen. Yet another factor is
   that certain groups are concentrated in parts of the country where
   religious expressions may be more (or less) common.

   Indeed, geographic region of residence is also associated with how
   likely teens are to witness religious activities and expressions in
   school. Teens in the South – where adults, on average, are more
   religious than in other regions – are particularly likely to report
   seeing religious expressions in school. About a quarter (23%) of
   Southern teens often or sometimes see other students praying before
   lunch, compared with 13% in the Northeast and 11% in both the Midwest
   and West.

   Public school students in the South also are more likely than those in
   other regions to report seeing students pray before sporting events and
   wear clothing or jewelry with religious symbols.

   There also are gender, age, and racial and ethnic differences in what
   adolescents experience in school. Girls are more likely than boys to
   see students wearing religious jewelry or clothing as well as more
   likely to see students inviting other students to religious services or
   youth group. Older adolescents are especially likely to say they
   “often” or “sometimes” see students pray before sporting events. And
   white (non-Hispanic) teens are more likely than nonwhite teens to see
   students inviting other students to youth groups or services.^8
   Unaffiliated teens tend to see fewer religious expressions and
   activities in school

   Aside from what they see in school, what are adolescents doing in
   school, religiously speaking?

   The survey asked religiously affiliated teens about their own religious
   practices and expressions in school. Among public school teens who
   identify with a religion, 31% say they at least sometimes wear clothing
   or jewelry with religious symbols, and about a quarter say they
   sometimes or often pray before lunch (26%) or invite other students to
   their worship services or a religious youth group (24%).^9 One-in-ten
   religiously affiliated teens say they regularly leave school for
   religious activities or programs.

   Evangelical Protestants stand out on some of these measures. Roughly
   four-in-ten evangelical Protestant teens who attend public school say
   they at least sometimes pray before lunch at school (39%), compared
   with 18% of Catholic teens and 11% of mainline Protestant teens.
   Similarly, about four-in-ten evangelical teens (43%) say they sometimes
   or often invite other students to their worship services or youth
   group, compared with 21% of mainline Protestants and 12% of Catholics
   who say they do this. Evangelical Protestant adolescents (38%) also are
   more likely than mainline Protestants (26%) to regularly wear religious
   clothing or jewelry.

   There are differences between boys and girls on some of these measures.
   While four-in-ten religiously affiliated girls (39%) sometimes or often
   wear religious jewelry or clothing, a quarter of religiously affiliated
   boys (25%) do so. This may be due to overall differences in the amount
   of jewelry that girls and boys wear; if girls wear jewelry more often
   than boys do in general, it stands to reason that they would also wear
   religious jewelry more often. But there also are gender differences
   when it comes to inviting fellow students to church or youth group:
   Nearly three-in-ten girls (28%) report that they sometimes or often
   invite others to their youth group or worship services, compared with
   one-in-five boys (20%).

   Religious activities and expressions in public schools vary by region,
   too. Religiously affiliated teens in the South (38%) are more likely
   than those in the Midwest (23%), West (20%) and Northeast (13%) to
   report praying before lunch at school. Southern teens (31%) also are
   more likely than teens in the West (21%) and Northeast (14%) to invite
   other students to their youth group or worship services.
   Evangelical Protestant teens most likely to pray before lunch and
   invite others to church or youth group

Most teens do not have religious support groups in school

   Most U.S. teens say there are no religious support or prayer groups
   that meet in their school The vast majority of U.S. teens who attend
   public schools say there is no religious support group or prayer group
   that meets in their school (82%). Nearly one-in-five teens say that
   religious support or prayer groups do meet in their schools (17%),
   including 5% who say they have participated in such a group in the last
   year and 12% who have not done so.

   Among Protestant teens, roughly three-in-ten (31%) say that a religious
   support group or prayer group meets in their school. But far fewer
   Catholics and religious “nones” say the same: Only about one-in-ten
   Catholic and unaffiliated teens report that their school hosts such a
   group.^10

   Unaffiliated teens also are highly unlikely to attend a support group,
   with fewer than 1% saying they have done so in the past year (the
   question was intended to capture nonreligious groups as well, such as
   the Secular Student Alliance). Protestant teens are somewhat more
   likely than their Catholic peers to participate in religious or prayer
   groups in school (11% vs 6%).

   Teens’ awareness of, and attendance at, religious support or prayer
   groups at their school also varies by region, with teens in the South
   more likely to say that prayer or religious support groups meet in
   their public school and that they, personally, participate in such
   activities, compared with those in the Northeast and West. Still, just
   9% of Southern teens who go to public school say that in the past year
   they have attended a prayer group or religious support group (such as
   the Fellowship of Christian Athletes) that meets in their school.

Religion in the classroom relatively rare

   About one-in-ten Southern teens in public schools say teacher has led
   prayer Relatively few U.S. teens in public schools report that they
   have ever seen teachers either lead a class in prayer (8%) or read from
   the Bible as an example of literature (8%).^11

   Protestant teens (11%) are more likely than unaffiliated teens (5%) to
   report that a teacher has led their class in prayer, and to report that
   a teacher has read from the Bible as an example of literature (12% vs.
   4%).

   Adolescents’ reports of teachers’ religious activities in the classroom
   also vary by race and ethnicity and region. Nonwhite teens are more
   likely than white (non-Hispanic) teens to say a teacher has led their
   class in prayer (11% vs. 5%) and read from the Bible as literature (12%
   vs. 6%). And teens in the South are especially likely to say a teacher
   has led their class in prayer (12%) and read from the Bible (13%) when
   compared with the small shares of teens in the Northeast who report the
   same (2% and 3%, respectively).

   Gender, age and grade are not associated with having seen teachers lead
   a class in prayer or read from the Bible as literature.

   Evangelical Protestant teens most likely to approve of teacher leading
   a class in prayer What do students in public schools think about
   teachers leading a class in prayer or reading from the Bible as an
   example of literature?

   About four-in-ten (41%) say they think it is appropriate for a teacher
   in their school to lead a class in prayer, and 55% say it is
   appropriate for a teacher to read from the Bible as an example of
   literature. But there are large differences by religion.

   Among those in public schools, religiously affiliated students (49%)
   are about twice as likely as religious “nones” (25%) to think it is
   acceptable for a teacher to lead a class in prayer. Affiliated
   adolescents also are more likely than “nones” to think it is acceptable
   for a teacher to read from the Bible as literature (62% vs. 42%).

   There are large differences among religiously affiliated adolescents as
   well. For instance, six-in-ten Protestants approve of a teacher leading
   a class in prayer, compared with four-in-ten Catholics who say this.
   Evangelical Protestants are especially likely to approve of teachers
   bringing religion into the classroom: Two-thirds of evangelical
   Protestant teens (68%) say it is appropriate for a teacher to lead a
   class in prayer, compared with four-in-ten mainline Protestants (41%).
   Roughly eight-in-ten evangelical Protestant teens approve of a teacher
   reading from the Bible as an example of literature (82%), compared with
   six-in-ten mainline Protestant teens who say this (59%).

   Views toward teachers bringing religion into the classroom also vary
   across racial and ethnic groups, regions, and grade levels. Nonwhite
   teens are more supportive of teachers praying: 46% of nonwhite teens
   think it is appropriate for teachers in public schools to lead a class
   in prayer, while 36% of non-Hispanic white teens think so. But there
   are no differences between white and nonwhite teens in views toward
   teachers reading from the Bible as an example of literature.

   Teens in the South and Midwest are particularly likely to approve of
   teachers praying and reading from the Bible in class. About half (55%)
   of Southern teens in public schools say it is appropriate for a teacher
   to lead a class in prayer. By comparison, three-in-ten teens in the
   West (30%) and Northeast (28%) think it is acceptable for a teacher to
   lead a class in prayer. There is a similar pattern on the question
   about teachers reading the Bible as literature.

   Teens who have been in school for more years are less supportive of
   teachers praying in the classroom. Nearly half (47%) of pre-high school
   teens think it is appropriate for a teacher to lead a class in prayer,
   compared with 37% of those in 11th and 12th grades.

   Most teens in public schools know their teachers are not permitted to
   lead a class in prayer The survey also asked teens what they know about
   the U.S. Supreme Court’s stance on teacher-led prayer, finding that
   those in 8th grade or lower are more likely than those in 9th through
   12th grades to incorrectly say that the court permits the practice (20%
   vs. 14%).

   Overall, most U.S. teens in public schools (82%) know that their
   teachers are not permitted to lead a class in prayer, according to
   rulings by the U.S. Supreme Court. At the same time, 16% think this is
   legally allowed – although this is much smaller than the share who
   think it would be appropriate (41%). Among just those who say
   teacher-led prayer is appropriate, a somewhat higher share believe it
   is permitted by law (28%), but 70% still know that it is
   unconstitutional.

   U.S. teens are much less familiar with the law when it comes to reading
   from the Bible as an example of literature, which the Supreme Court has
   ruled permissible. About a third (36%) of U.S. teens in public school
   know that their teachers are permitted to do this, while six-in-ten
   (62%) think it is not allowed.

   Evangelical Protestant teens stand out from other traditions on this
   measure: 47% know that public school teachers are allowed to read from
   the Bible as literature, compared with about a third each of mainline
   Protestant teens (34%), religious “nones” (33%) and Catholics (32%).

   In contrast with the question about teacher-led prayer, teens in 11th
   and 12th grades are less likely to correctly answer this question than
   those in eighth grade or lower.

   There are no statistically significant differences across regions on
   either of these questions.

Relatively few teens witness religion-related bullying in schools

   Majority of teens regularly witness bullying at school To further
   explore what teens are encountering in their schools, the survey asked
   about experiences with teasing, bullying and being subject to
   unfriendly comments. The analyses of bullying and hostility toward
   religion in school include students in both religious and nonreligious
   schools (but not those who are home-schooled). ^12

   Many educators, parents, and researchers have pointed out that bullying
   is a major concern in U.S. schools, and the new survey finds that 54%
   of U.S. teens report regularly seeing students in their school being
   teased or made fun of – including 16% who say they often see this and
   38% who sometimes see it. About three-in-ten say they rarely witness
   bullying in school, while 14% say they never see it.

   Christians and religious “nones,” boys and girls, and older and younger
   teens are all about equally likely to witness bullying in school. Teens
   who live in the Midwest (59%) and the South (58%) are somewhat more
   likely than those in the West (46%) to say they see other students
   being teased or made fun of in school with any regularity. But, on the
   whole, there is little variation in how often students in these various
   demographic categories report witnessing bullying.

   Most teens rarely or never witness religiously motivated bullying in
   their school While many teens in both public and private schools
   observe bullying in their school, fewer say that they see other
   students being teased or made fun of because of their religion,
   specifically. In fact, six-in-ten (58%) say they never witness this
   type of behavior, and 28% say they rarely see it. One-in-ten say that
   they sometimes see religiously motivated bullying in their school
   (11%), and 2% see this often.

   On this question, mainline Protestants stand out from other religious
   groups as being the least likely to say that they regularly see
   religious bullying in their school. Just 3% say they witness this
   behavior at least sometimes, compared with 11% among religious “nones,”
   13% among Catholic teens and 17% among evangelicals. Evangelical teens
   are the least likely to say that they never see religious bullying in
   their school (48%).

   Across many demographic groups, most school-attending teens rarely, if
   ever, see other students being bullied for their religion. There are
   virtually no differences between boys and girls, younger and older
   teens, or across regions on this question.

   Few teens subject to religious bullying in their school Among public or
   private school students who are affiliated with a religious tradition,
   roughly one-in-ten say that they, personally, have ever been teased or
   made fun of in school because of their religion.^13

   Just 1% of mainline Protestant teens say they have ever been bullied in
   school for their religion, compared with 10% of evangelicals and 9% of
   Catholic teens who say the same.

   There are few discernible differences on this question among
   religiously affiliated teens by gender, age, and race and ethnicity.
   Roughly one-in-ten or fewer in each demographic group say they have
   personally been teased or made fun of in school because of their
   religion.

   Unaffiliated teens were asked a similar question about being teased for
   their lack of religion.  Among students who identify religiously as
   atheist, agnostic or “nothing in particular,” very few (4%) say they
   have personally experienced bullying in school because they are not
   religious.

   About one-in-ten affiliated, unaffiliated teens say other students have
   been unfriendly to their religious beliefs The survey also asked teens
   whether other students have been “unfriendly” to their religious or
   spiritual views. Those who said “yes” then had the opportunity to
   explain, in their own words, how this has occurred, with the goal of
   getting more details about any religiously motivated bullying that
   teens may be facing in school.

   Overall, about one-in-ten of all school-attending adolescents report
   that other students have been unfriendly toward their religious views.
   And they give a wide range of responses to demonstrate just what they
   are experiencing from their peers.

   Some religiously affiliated students say they have been bullied for
   their religious beliefs (3%). They report some general examples, such
   as other students “making fun of my religion,” “they make fun of me
   going to church” or “they think I attend church too much.” Other teens
   give examples of more specific comments they have experienced, such as
   “someone told me that they used to think I was intelligent until they
   found out I believed in God” and “[they] made fun of Catholics.”

   A similar share of religiously unaffiliated students (4%) give examples
   of how they feel bullied for their lack of religious beliefs. They
   report that their peers “[say] that I was the reason the country is
   going downhill” and that “they say I’ll go to hell for not believing in
   [G]od.”

   Equally small shares of both affiliated and unaffiliated teens (1%
   each) note that they have lost friends or felt distanced from former
   friends due to different beliefs.

   Few teens have experienced teachers being unfriendly to their religion
   School-attending teens are slightly less likely to say that teachers
   have been unfriendly toward their religious or spiritual views than
   they are to say the same about other students (5% vs. 9%). Those who
   report that they have experienced this type of behavior by a teacher
   cite a variety of circumstances and ways in which it has happened.

   Some teens who belong to a religion offer responses that indicate a
   teacher challenged the students’ religious beliefs, including
   questioning a student’s intelligence (2%). These teens report
   experiences such as, “I had a life science teacher once talk for 30
   minutes about why religion is stupid and a joke” and “they’ve made fun
   of me and not supported me in going to my before school scripture study
   class.”

   At the other end of the spectrum, some teens who identify as religious
   “nones” report animosity toward their views from teachers who the teens
   perceive as promoting their own beliefs (2%). One student recalls a
   teacher “posting pro Christianity posters in [the] classroom, making
   negative comments about those who don’t worship Christianity.” Another
   says: “A few teachers kinda force me to believe that [G]od is real.”

   One-in-ten teenage students report teachers making them uncomfortable
   with comments about religion The survey also asked students a more
   general question: Has a teacher ever said anything about religion that
   made you feel uncomfortable? About one-in-ten students say they have
   experienced this type of discomfort in their schools, with some small
   distinctions between those who have a religion and those who do not.

   Some religiously affiliated students share examples of teachers
   challenging religious beliefs, even if they were not personally
   challenging the respondent: “[The teachers said] that God was make
   believe and religion was to control the masses” and “taught us multiple
   religions as if they were all true.” At the same time, some students
   who identify as religious “nones” note their discomfort when they
   perceive teachers as promoting particular religious beliefs. For
   instance, one teen reports that teachers have “brought the [Ten
   Commandments] to class and preached.” Some expound on why a teacher’s
   comments were unacceptable: “This teacher was heavily promoting having
   a relationship with God as being the most important thing in life and I
   didn’t think that was appropriate to express while teaching an
   unrelated subject.”

Teenage friendships and religion

   Affiliated teens more likely to have religiously similar friends
   According to sociologists, religion is usually a social phenomenon,
   taking place among a community of believers.^14 People affect – and are
   affected by – the religious and spiritual beliefs and activities of
   their friends and family. Contemporary research points to the idea that
   social interactions promote and maintain religious worldviews.^15 And
   among teenagers, too, there is evidence that the friendships
   adolescents form in school influence their religious trajectories.^16

   Indeed, most teens have at least some friends who share their religion
   (or lack thereof). Overall, only about a quarter (27%) say that “hardly
   any” or “none” of their friends share their religion – or, in the case
   of unaffiliated respondents, that “hardly any” or “none” of their
   friends are atheist, agnostic, or have no particular religion.
   Three-in-ten teens report that most or all of their friends share their
   religion, and even more (43%) say some of their friends share their
   religious identity.

   There is good reason to expect that this should vary by religion. Most
   Americans identify as Christians of some kind, meaning it may be harder
   for nonreligious adolescents to find friends who are like them,
   religiously. That is borne out by the data: Religiously affiliated
   teens as a whole are roughly twice as likely as religious “nones” (36%
   vs. 16%) to report that most or all of their friends share their
   religion (or lack thereof). About four-in-ten unaffiliated teens (38%)
   say that hardly any or none of their friends are, like them, atheist,
   agnostic or “nothing in particular” when it comes to religion.

   Among adults, some religious groups are more likely than others to have
   friendship networks that reflect their own beliefs or affiliations.^17
   Protestants, for example, are overall less likely than Catholics,
   members of non-Christian faiths and religious “nones” to have
   interreligious social connections. But, unlike adults, Protestant
   adolescents are no more likely than Catholic teens to say that most or
   all of their friends share their religion.^18

   Aside from religious affiliation, region, age and grade play few, if
   any, statistically significant roles in the religious makeup of
   adolescents’ social networks. But gender is a factor. A third of girls
   (33%) report that most or all of their friends share their religious
   identity, making them moderately more likely than boys (27%) to be in
   that situation.

Most teens do not regularly talk to friends about religion

   Evangelical Protestant teens especially likely to talk to friends about
   religion For most teens, religion is not a regular topic of
   conversation with friends. Roughly two-thirds (64%) say they rarely or
   never talk to their friends about religion. Still, a sizable minority
   of American teenagers (36%) say they sometimes or often talk with
   friends about religion.

   Not surprisingly, religious teens are particularly likely to engage in
   these kinds of discussions. Almost half (45%) of religiously affiliated
   teens report that they regularly (that is, “sometimes” or “often”) talk
   to their friends about religion. Conversely, only 17% of unaffiliated
   teens at least sometimes talk to their friends about religion.

   But there also are differences among religiously affiliated teens. A
   majority of evangelical Protestant teens (58%) regularly talk to their
   friends about religion, compared with about four-in-ten mainline
   Protestant teens (39%) and roughly a third of Catholics (35%).

   In addition to religious affiliation, gender and region also are
   related factors. Four-in-ten girls (41%) report sometimes or often
   talking to their friends about religion; just three-in-ten boys (31%)
   say the same.

   Adolescents in the South are particularly likely to talk to their
   friends about religion. About four-in-ten Southern teens (41%) report
   doing so at least sometimes, while smaller shares in the West (31%) and
   Northeast (29%) say the same.

   There are fewer differences across age, grade, and race and ethnicity
   in how frequently teens report talking with friends about religion.
    1. Teens were asked if they have ever had a teacher lead their class
       in prayer, not just in their current school. It is possible that
       some teens who have experienced teacher-led prayer and now attend
       public schools may have attended other types of schools (for
       example, private school or home school) in the past and experienced
       teacher-led prayer in those places, which is not a violation of the
       Constitution. ↩
    2. A small share (3%) of teenage public school students did not answer
       one or both of these questions on teacher-led prayer. ↩
    3. Religion and American Public Education: Conservative Religious
       Agendas and the U.S. Constitution.” Education and Urban Society.
       Also see Cheadle, Jacob E. and Philip Schwadel. 2012. “The
       ‘Friendship Dynamics of Religion,’ or the ‘Religious Dynamics of
       Friendship’? A Social Network Analysis of Adolescents Who Attend
       Small Schools.” Social Science Research. ↩
    4. The figures for teens who attend public school here and throughout
       the report include those who say they attend charter or magnet
       schools. ↩
    5. According to 2019 estimates from the National Center for Education
       Statistics (NCES), 9% of high school students enrolled in school
       (not counting home-schooled students) are in private schools. In
       the survey sample, 5% of high school students enrolled in schools
       are in private schools. It is more difficult to calculate a
       national estimate for those who are home-schooled because U.S.
       states vary in their laws around reporting home-schooling
       statistics. Nonetheless, the NCES estimates that 4% of high
       school-aged adolescents in the U.S. were home-schooled in 2016, the
       most recent year for which the estimates are available. ↩
    6. An additional reason for this analytical decision is to avoid
       conflating the associations between adolescent characteristics and
       religious experiences in schools with the type of school teens
       attend. For example, Catholic teens who attend Catholic schools are
       presumably much more likely to experience prayer and other
       religious activities in school, which would disproportionately
       affect the Catholic figures in the analysis. See Uecker, Jeremy E.
       2008. “Alternative Schooling Strategies and the Religious Lives of
       American Adolescents.” Journal for the Scientific Study of
       Religion. ↩
    7. For a discussion of Americans’ tendency to have friends who are
       religiously like themselves, see McPherson, Miller, Lynn
       Smith-Lovin and James M. Cook. 2001. “Birds of a Feather: Homophily
       in Social Networks.” Annual Review of Sociology. ↩
    8. The net nonwhite category includes teens who identify as black,
       Asian, Hispanic, some other race, or multiple races. It is the unit
       of analysis in this survey because the sample sizes for most of the
       nonwhite categories are too small to analyze individually. The
       combined category is used in this report so that broad comparisons
       can be made to highlight differences between groups. Researchers
       prefer to break out subgroups when possible to show the differences
       that may exist between groups of people. The use of a net nonwhite
       category is not intended to obscure the fact that the religious
       experiences and behaviors of black Americans, Hispanic Americans,
       and Americans of other races and ethnicities may be quite
       different. ↩
    9. The survey did not ask teens specifically how they pray before
       lunch, therefore this practice could include everything from prayer
       with a public component (for example, prayers said aloud or prayers
       preceded by or followed by the sign of the cross) to private
       prayers that students pray silently. ↩
   10. This question was asked of both religiously affiliated and
       unaffiliated teens and included examples of religious groups (for
       example, the Fellowship of Christian Athletes) and nonreligious
       groups (the question referenced the “Secular Student Association”)
       under the broader umbrella of religious support or prayer groups. ↩
   11. Teens were asked if they have ever had a teacher lead their class
       in prayer, not just in their current school. It is possible that
       some teens who have experienced teacher-led prayer and now attend
       public schools may have attended other types of schools (for
       example, private school or home school) in the past and experienced
       teacher-led prayer in those places, which is not a violation of the
       Constitution. ↩
   12. The analyses here are expanded to include private schools because
       research shows that bullying is not limited to public schools. And,
       even when examining religiously motivated bullying, there are not
       the same concerns about conflating the type of school a teen
       attends (e.g. religious private school) with the potential types of
       unfriendliness toward religion that he or she may experience in
       that setting. See Choy, Susan P. 1997. “Public and Private Schools:
       How Do They Differ?” National Center for Education Statistics. ↩
   13. Much of the research on religion-related bullying focuses on
       minority religions, such as Judaism and Islam in the United States.
       This report, however, does not analyze responses from Jewish or
       Muslim teens separately due to insufficient sample sizes. Jewish
       and Muslim teens (and those from other religious groups) are
       included in the full sample and in the analysis of religiously
       affiliated teens. See Dupper, David R., Shandra Forrest-Bank and
       Autumn Lowry-Carusillo. 2015. “Experiences of Religious Minorities
       in Public School Settings: Findings from Focus Groups Involving
       Muslim, Jewish, Catholic, and Unitarian Universalist Youths.”
       Children & Schools. ↩
   14. The social nature of religion is a key theme in social scientific
       research. This is perhaps most famously associated with the work of
       the sociologist Emile Durkheim. Durkheim argued that interaction
       among co-religionists creates and reinforces religion by fostering
       solidarity through the creation and veneration of shared symbols.
       See Durkheim, Emile. 1912. “The Elementary Forms of the Religious
       Life.” ↩
   15. Stroope, Samuel. 2012. “Social Networks and Religion: The Role of
       Congregational Social Embeddedness in Religious Belief and
       Practice.” Sociology of Religion. ↩
   16. Cheadle, Jacob E. and Philip Schwadel. 2012. “The ‘Friendship
       Dynamics of Religion,’ or the ‘Religious Dynamics of Friendship’? A
       Social Network Analysis of Adolescents Who Attend Small Schools.”
       Social Science Research. ↩
   17. Smith, Christian. 1998. “American Evangelicalism: Embattled and
       Thriving.” ↩
   18. For the research on interreligious social connections by religious
       group, see Scheitle, Christopher P. and Buster G. Smith. 2011. “A
       Note on the Frequency and Sources of Close Interreligious Ties.”
       Journal for the Scientific Study of Religion. ↩

Pagination

   Next: Acknowledgments Next Page → ← Prev Page
    1. You are reading page 1
    2. Page 2
    3. Page 3

Report Materials

     * Complete Report PDF
     * Topline
     * Appendix A: Detailed tables
     * Essay: Religion in Public Schools

Table of Contents

     * Overview
          + Religion in school
          + Relatively few teens witness religion-related bullying in
            schools
          + Teenage friendships and religion
     * Acknowledgments
     * Methodology

Related

   PublicationsOct 3, 2019

Religion in the Public Schools

   PublicationsJul 23, 2019

What Americans Know About Religion

   PublicationsJul 15, 2019

A Closer Look at How Religious Restrictions Have Risen Around the World

   PublicationsJun 11, 2019

Americans See Catholic Clergy Sex Abuse as an Ongoing Problem

   PublicationsApr 30, 2019

In Western European Countries With Church Taxes, Support for the Tradition
Remains Strong

Topics

     * Religion and Society
     * Education
     * Teens and Youth

Popular On Pew Research

   Fact Tank01/17/2019

Defining generations: Where Millennials end and Generation Z begins

   Fact Tank09/06/2018

Are you in the American middle class? Find out with our income calculator

   Fact Tank11/28/2018

5 facts about illegal immigration in the U.S.

   Internet & Tech03/01/2018

Social Media Use in 2018

   Social Trends01/17/2019

Generation Z Looks a Lot Like Millennials on Key Social and Political Issues

   Get Pew Research Center data by email ____________________ Signup

   Pew Research Center 1615 L St. NW, Suite 800 Washington, DC 20036 USA
   (+1) 202-419-4300 | Main (+1) 202-419-4349 | Fax (+1) 202-419-4372 |
   Media Inquiries

Research Areas

     * U.S. Politics & Policy
     * Journalism & Media
     * Internet & Technology
     * Science & Society
     * Religion & Public Life
     * Hispanic Trends
     * Global Attitudes & Trends
     * Social & Demographic Trends

Follow Us

     * Email Newsletters
     * Facebook
     * Twitter
     * Tumblr
     * YouTube
     * RSS

   About Pew Research Center Pew Research Center is a nonpartisan fact
   tank that informs the public about the issues, attitudes and trends
   shaping the world. It conducts public opinion polling, demographic
   research, media content analysis and other empirical social science
   research. Pew Research Center does not take policy positions. It is a
   subsidiary of The Pew Charitable Trusts.

     * Copyright 2019 Pew Research Center
     * About
     * Terms & Conditions
     * Privacy Policy
     * Reprints, Permissions & Use Policy
     * Feedback
     * Careers

   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-N8242V9
   #Pew Research Center's Religion & Public Life Project RSS Feed
   alternate alternate JSON Representation Prism XML Version Plain Text
   Version

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MVFJNW

   Numbers, Facts and Trends Shaping Your World

   About Follow
   My Account
   Log in View Account Log out
   Donate

   Pew Research Center

   Religion & Public Life
     * Menu
     * Research Areas

     * Home
     * U.S. Politics
     * Media & News
     * Social Trends
     * Religion
     * Internet & Tech
     * Science
     * Hispanics
     * Global
     * Methods

     * Publications
     * Topics
     * Interactives
     * Data and Resources
     * Experts

   October 3, 2019

For a Lot of American Teens, Religion Is a Regular Part of the Public School
Day

   Yet many other U.S. adolescents rarely observe religious behavior in
   their schools, and a majority say they rarely or never discuss religion
   with friends
   (Lewis Geyer/Digital First Media/Boulder Daily Camera via Getty Images)

   Religion in public schools has long been a controversial issue. The
   U.S. Supreme Court ruled in 1962 that teachers and administrators
   cannot lead prayers in public schools, and a decision in 2000 barred
   school districts from sponsoring student-led prayers at football games.
   At the same time, the court has held that students retain a First
   Amendment right to the free exercise of religion and may voluntarily
   pray before, during and after school. Where exactly to draw the line
   between constitutionally protected religious activity and impermissible
   state-sponsored religious indoctrination remains under dispute. This
   year, the Supreme Court declined to hear a case involving a high school
   coach who was fired for leading prayer after games, just one of several
   recent controversies in this area of law.

   While periodic battles continue in the courts, what is the day-to-day
   experience of students in public schools across the country? A new Pew
   Research Center survey asked a nationally representative sample of more
   than 1,800 teenagers (ages 13 to 17) about the kinds of religious
   activity they engage in – or see other students engaging in – during
   the course of the school day.

   The survey finds that about four-in-ten teens who attend public schools
   say they commonly (either “often” or “sometimes”) see other students
   praying before sporting events at school. This includes about half of
   teenage public schoolers who live in the South, where students are more
   likely than those in other regions to witness and partake in various
   religious expressions at school.

   Clothing and jewelry are most common forms of religious expression seen
   in public schools In addition, roughly half of U.S. teens who attend
   public school say they commonly see other students in their school
   wearing religious clothing (such as an Islamic headscarf) or jewelry
   with religious symbols (such as a necklace with a Christian cross or a
   Jewish Star of David).

   Four-in-ten U.S. teens see at least two of these five types of
   religious expression on a regular basis About a quarter of teens who
   attend public schools say they often or sometimes see students invite
   other students to religious youth groups or worship services. About
   one-in-six (16%) often or sometimes see other students praying before
   lunch in their public school. And 8% report that they commonly see
   other teenagers reading religious scripture outside of class during the
   school day.

   Overall, on an index combining these five types of religious
   expressions and activities by fellow students – wearing religious
   clothing or jewelry, praying before a sporting event, inviting other
   students to youth groups or services, praying before eating lunch, and
   reading religious scripture during the school day – 8% of teens in
   public schools say they commonly see all five (3%) or four out of five
   (5%). A third of students say they often or sometimes see two (20%) or
   three (13%) of these forms of religious expression in their public
   school, while 26% say they commonly see just one. And a third of public
   school teens (32%) say they rarely or never see any of these religious
   expressions by fellow students (or they did not answer the questions).
   Among teens in public schools in the South, 12% say teacher has ever
   led a class in prayer


   The survey also asked about two kinds of teacher-led, classroom
   activities. It finds that 8% of public school students say they have
   ever had a teacher lead their class in prayer – an action that the
   courts have ruled is a violation of the Establishment Clause of the
   Constitution.^1 An identical share (8%) say they have had a teacher
   read from the Bible as an example of literature, which the courts have
   said is fine. Both of these experiences are more common in the South
   (where 12% of public school students say a teacher has led their class
   in prayer, and 13% say a teacher has read to them from the Bible as
   literature) than in the Northeast (where just 2% say a teacher has lead
   them in prayer, and 3% say a teacher has read from the Bible as an
   example of literature).

   Nationwide, roughly four-in-ten teens (including 68% of evangelical
   Protestant teens) who go to public school say they think it is
   “appropriate” for a teacher to lead a class in prayer. Some of the
   teens who express this view are unaware of the Supreme Court’s ruling.
   But most know what the law is; 82% of U.S. teens in public schools (and
   79% of evangelical teens) correctly answer a factual question about the
   constitutionality of teacher-led prayer in public school classrooms.
   Just 16% of teens incorrectly believe that teacher-led prayer is
   allowed by law, far fewer than the 41% who say it is “appropriate.”

   Put another way, roughly half of teens who attend public school (53%)
   know that teacher-led prayer is prohibited and also find the practice
   inappropriate. At the same time, roughly three-in-ten (29%) know that
   it is unconstitutional but say that it is appropriate for a public
   school teacher to lead a class in prayer. Smaller shares think that
   teacher-led prayer is both legally permitted and appropriate (11%) or
   that it is permitted but inappropriate (4%).^2 A quarter of religiously
   affiliated teens say they sometimes or often pray before lunch in
   public school

   In addition to asking about what they have seen in school, the survey
   also asked teens who identify with a religion and attend a public
   school whether they personally participate in religious expressions in
   their school. Roughly three-in-ten or fewer say they regularly wear
   jewelry or clothing with religious symbols, pray before lunch, invite
   other students to worship services or a youth group, or leave school
   during the day to participate in religious activities.

   To be sure, some religiously affiliated public school students do many
   of these four things on a regular basis: 12% say they sometimes or
   often participate in three or more of these religious expressions at
   school. But roughly half (49%) of the students surveyed say they rarely
   or never participate in any of these religious expressions during the
   school day, or they did not answer the questions. In addition, only 5%
   of all public school students say that there is a religious support or
   prayer group that meets in their school and that they have taken part
   in it in the past year. The vast majority say that as far as they know,
   there is no such group in their school.

   An experience that is more common in American schools – both public and
   private – is bullying. The majority of U.S. teens surveyed say they
   either “often” (16%) or “sometimes” (38%) see students in their school
   being teased or made fun of. But this is rarely for religious reasons:
   Just 13% say they regularly see fellow students being teased because of
   their religion, and even fewer say they have directly experienced
   religiously motivated bullying. Overall, teens are far more likely to
   say they “rarely” or “never” see this type of bullying than they are to
   report that they sometimes or often witness such behavior.

   At the same time, roughly one-in-ten teens in public and private
   schools (9%) say that other students have made comments that are
   unfriendly to their personal religious or spiritual views, and 5% say
   that teachers have made such comments.

   These are among the key findings of a survey of 1,811 U.S. adolescents
   ages 13 to 17, conducted online from March 29 to April 14, 2019. The
   survey was administered using the Ipsos KnowledgePanel and asked
   questions of both a teenager and one of their parents; this report
   focuses on the responses of the teens. For more information on how this
   survey was conducted, see the Methodology.

   While several previous surveys have examined the religious lives of
   teenagers, this is the first large-scale, nationally representative
   survey asking teens a series of questions about their own practices and
   perceptions regarding religious expressions in public schools.

   This topic is important to the broader study of religion in American
   society because of the friendships adolescents form in their classes
   and the way they experience religion in public spaces during some of
   their most formative years.^3

   Evangelical Protestant teens most likely to pray at lunch and invite
   others to church or youth group The survey included teens from many
   religious backgrounds, including non-Christian faiths, such as Judaism,
   Islam, Buddhism and Hinduism. However, the sample of 1,811 teens did
   not include enough teens in those religious groups – or in some of the
   smaller Christian traditions, such as the Church of Jesus Christ of
   Latter-day Saints (sometimes called Mormons) or the historically black
   Protestant tradition – to allow their views to be analyzed and reported
   separately. The sample size is sufficient, though, to allow separate
   analysis of Catholic, evangelical Protestant, mainline Protestant and
   religiously unaffiliated teens.

   Other findings in this report include:
     * Teens who identify as evangelical Protestants are much more likely
       than Catholics and mainline Protestants to participate in religious
       activities in their public school, such as praying before lunch or
       inviting other students to their worship services or a religious
       youth group. For example, among teens who attend public schools,
       39% of evangelical Protestants say they sometimes or often pray
       before lunch, compared with 18% of Catholics and 11% of mainline
       Protestants who say they do this.
     * Teens with no religious affiliation – those who identify as
       atheist, agnostic or “nothing in particular,” sometimes called
       religious “nones” – are less likely than others to notice religious
       activities in their schools. For instance, just 17% of unaffiliated
       teens say they sometimes or often see other students invite someone
       to worship services or a religious youth group, compared with
       three-in-ten Christian teens (31%) who commonly see this happen.
       These differences may reflect their circles of friends, the schools
       they attend, their attentiveness to religious behavior, or other
       factors.
     * About three-quarters of all religiously affiliated teens (78%)
       report that at least some of their friends share their religion. A
       smaller proportion (60%) of all religiously unaffiliated teens say
       they have friends who identify – like they do – as atheist,
       agnostic or nothing in particular. Indeed, 19% of unaffiliated
       teens say that none of their friends are religiously unaffiliated,
       and an additional 19% say that “hardly any” of their friends share
       their lack of religious affiliation.
     * Most American teens (64%) say they rarely or never discuss religion
       with their friends, and only 5% say they often engage in such
       discussions. Again, evangelical Protestants are much more likely
       than others to engage in this type of religious behavior; roughly
       six-in-ten evangelical teens say they sometimes (47%) or often
       (11%) talk to their friends about religion, compared with
       four-in-ten mainline Protestant teens, a third of Catholics and
       about one-in-five religious “nones” who at least sometimes discuss
       religion with friends.

   more likely than boys to talk to their friends about religion
     * Religion seems to play a somewhat larger role in friendships for
       adolescent girls than for boys. The survey shows that girls are
       more likely than boys to talk to their friends about religion (41%
       vs. 31%) and somewhat more likely to be religiously similar to most
       of their friends. Girls who attend public school also are more
       likely to notice when other students wear clothing or jewelry with
       religious symbols and to invite other students to their religious
       youth group or worship services. This reflects a broader pattern
       among adults: Women are generally more religious than men,
       particularly among Christians.
     * Just 1% of mainline Protestant teens say they have ever been teased
       or made fun of in school for their religion, compared with 9% of
       Catholic teens and 10% of evangelicals who say the same.

   The rest of this report explores findings from the survey’s questions
   about religion in school and among teenagers’ friendship circles in
   more detail, including analysis by religious group, age and grade
   level, race or ethnicity, gender, and geographic region.

Religion in school

Most teens surveyed attend public schools, fewer attend private schools or
are home-schooled

   One-in-ten evangelical Protestants are home-schooled The vast majority
   (87%) of teenagers surveyed say they attend public schools.^4 An
   additional 5% attend religious private schools, while 6% are
   home-schooled. Just 1% attend a nonreligious private school.^5

   However, the type of school adolescents attend tends to vary depending
   on their self-described religious background. Teens who describe
   themselves as evangelical Protestants are more likely to be
   home-schooled (11%) than “nones” (5%) and Catholics (2%). And, not
   surprisingly, teens with a religious affiliation (6%) are more likely
   than those without one (1%) to attend a religious private school. The
   survey indicates that Catholic teens are more likely than Protestant
   teens (9% vs. 4%) to attend a religious school.

   Most of the analyses in this report are limited to teenagers who attend
   a public school. When it comes to experiences with religion in a school
   environment, adolescents who attend religious schools or are
   home-schooled are much different from those who do not, and the survey
   did not include sufficiently large samples of students who attend
   religious private schools, or who are being home-schooled, to compare
   these groups with teenagers who go to public schools.^6

Most U.S. teens commonly see at least one type of religious expression in
public school

   Some religious expressions are relatively common in public schools. For
   instance, about half (53%) of U.S. teens in public schools often or
   sometimes see other students wearing clothing or jewelry with religious
   symbols, and four-in-ten (39%) regularly see students praying before a
   sporting event.

   Other religious activities and expressions are less common. A quarter
   of teens in public schools (26%) say they often or sometimes see
   students inviting other students to religious youth groups or worship
   services. About one-in-six (16%) regularly see other teens praying
   before lunch, and 8% often or sometimes see students reading religious
   scripture outside of class. This means that large majorities of U.S.
   teens rarely or never see these behaviors in school.

   On an index combining all five of these types of religious expression
   in school, about a third of teens (32%) say they rarely or never see
   any of them (or they did not answer the questions), while just 3% say
   they see all five on a regular basis. Another way to sum up their
   experiences: On the one hand, a majority of teens (68%) report seeing
   at least one of these religious expressions or activities in their
   public schools often or sometimes; on the other hand, fewer than half
   (41%) say they commonly see more than one of these religious behaviors.

   There are substantial differences in what students tend to see in
   public school depending on the student’s religious affiliation.
   Religiously affiliated teens are more likely than unaffiliated teens to
   say they at least sometimes see each of the five types of religious
   activities or expressions in school. There also are differences among
   religiously affiliated teens. For instance, Protestant teens (38%) are
   twice as likely as Catholic teens (19%) to say they see students
   inviting other students to youth group or worship services at least
   sometimes. And there are differences even among Protestants:
   Evangelical Protestant teens (18%) are twice as likely as mainline
   Protestants (8%) to say they regularly see their peers reading
   religious scripture in school.

   It is not completely clear what accounts for such large differences in
   what adolescents see in their schools. It is possible that the tendency
   to have religiously similar friendship circles (see here) affects what
   students see.^7 For example, religious teens – who tend to have friends
   who are similarly religious – may be exposed to more religious
   activities and expressions. But it’s also possible that religious and
   nonreligious teens may perceive the world somewhat differently: What
   may appear as a religious expression to an evangelical Protestant teen
   may not even be noticed by a nonreligious teen. Yet another factor is
   that certain groups are concentrated in parts of the country where
   religious expressions may be more (or less) common.

   Indeed, geographic region of residence is also associated with how
   likely teens are to witness religious activities and expressions in
   school. Teens in the South – where adults, on average, are more
   religious than in other regions – are particularly likely to report
   seeing religious expressions in school. About a quarter (23%) of
   Southern teens often or sometimes see other students praying before
   lunch, compared with 13% in the Northeast and 11% in both the Midwest
   and West.

   Public school students in the South also are more likely than those in
   other regions to report seeing students pray before sporting events and
   wear clothing or jewelry with religious symbols.

   There also are gender, age, and racial and ethnic differences in what
   adolescents experience in school. Girls are more likely than boys to
   see students wearing religious jewelry or clothing as well as more
   likely to see students inviting other students to religious services or
   youth group. Older adolescents are especially likely to say they
   “often” or “sometimes” see students pray before sporting events. And
   white (non-Hispanic) teens are more likely than nonwhite teens to see
   students inviting other students to youth groups or services.^8
   Unaffiliated teens tend to see fewer religious expressions and
   activities in school

   Aside from what they see in school, what are adolescents doing in
   school, religiously speaking?

   The survey asked religiously affiliated teens about their own religious
   practices and expressions in school. Among public school teens who
   identify with a religion, 31% say they at least sometimes wear clothing
   or jewelry with religious symbols, and about a quarter say they
   sometimes or often pray before lunch (26%) or invite other students to
   their worship services or a religious youth group (24%).^9 One-in-ten
   religiously affiliated teens say they regularly leave school for
   religious activities or programs.

   Evangelical Protestants stand out on some of these measures. Roughly
   four-in-ten evangelical Protestant teens who attend public school say
   they at least sometimes pray before lunch at school (39%), compared
   with 18% of Catholic teens and 11% of mainline Protestant teens.
   Similarly, about four-in-ten evangelical teens (43%) say they sometimes
   or often invite other students to their worship services or youth
   group, compared with 21% of mainline Protestants and 12% of Catholics
   who say they do this. Evangelical Protestant adolescents (38%) also are
   more likely than mainline Protestants (26%) to regularly wear religious
   clothing or jewelry.

   There are differences between boys and girls on some of these measures.
   While four-in-ten religiously affiliated girls (39%) sometimes or often
   wear religious jewelry or clothing, a quarter of religiously affiliated
   boys (25%) do so. This may be due to overall differences in the amount
   of jewelry that girls and boys wear; if girls wear jewelry more often
   than boys do in general, it stands to reason that they would also wear
   religious jewelry more often. But there also are gender differences
   when it comes to inviting fellow students to church or youth group:
   Nearly three-in-ten girls (28%) report that they sometimes or often
   invite others to their youth group or worship services, compared with
   one-in-five boys (20%).

   Religious activities and expressions in public schools vary by region,
   too. Religiously affiliated teens in the South (38%) are more likely
   than those in the Midwest (23%), West (20%) and Northeast (13%) to
   report praying before lunch at school. Southern teens (31%) also are
   more likely than teens in the West (21%) and Northeast (14%) to invite
   other students to their youth group or worship services.
   Evangelical Protestant teens most likely to pray before lunch and
   invite others to church or youth group

Most teens do not have religious support groups in school

   Most U.S. teens say there are no religious support or prayer groups
   that meet in their school The vast majority of U.S. teens who attend
   public schools say there is no religious support group or prayer group
   that meets in their school (82%). Nearly one-in-five teens say that
   religious support or prayer groups do meet in their schools (17%),
   including 5% who say they have participated in such a group in the last
   year and 12% who have not done so.

   Among Protestant teens, roughly three-in-ten (31%) say that a religious
   support group or prayer group meets in their school. But far fewer
   Catholics and religious “nones” say the same: Only about one-in-ten
   Catholic and unaffiliated teens report that their school hosts such a
   group.^10

   Unaffiliated teens also are highly unlikely to attend a support group,
   with fewer than 1% saying they have done so in the past year (the
   question was intended to capture nonreligious groups as well, such as
   the Secular Student Alliance). Protestant teens are somewhat more
   likely than their Catholic peers to participate in religious or prayer
   groups in school (11% vs 6%).

   Teens’ awareness of, and attendance at, religious support or prayer
   groups at their school also varies by region, with teens in the South
   more likely to say that prayer or religious support groups meet in
   their public school and that they, personally, participate in such
   activities, compared with those in the Northeast and West. Still, just
   9% of Southern teens who go to public school say that in the past year
   they have attended a prayer group or religious support group (such as
   the Fellowship of Christian Athletes) that meets in their school.

Religion in the classroom relatively rare

   About one-in-ten Southern teens in public schools say teacher has led
   prayer Relatively few U.S. teens in public schools report that they
   have ever seen teachers either lead a class in prayer (8%) or read from
   the Bible as an example of literature (8%).^11

   Protestant teens (11%) are more likely than unaffiliated teens (5%) to
   report that a teacher has led their class in prayer, and to report that
   a teacher has read from the Bible as an example of literature (12% vs.
   4%).

   Adolescents’ reports of teachers’ religious activities in the classroom
   also vary by race and ethnicity and region. Nonwhite teens are more
   likely than white (non-Hispanic) teens to say a teacher has led their
   class in prayer (11% vs. 5%) and read from the Bible as literature (12%
   vs. 6%). And teens in the South are especially likely to say a teacher
   has led their class in prayer (12%) and read from the Bible (13%) when
   compared with the small shares of teens in the Northeast who report the
   same (2% and 3%, respectively).

   Gender, age and grade are not associated with having seen teachers lead
   a class in prayer or read from the Bible as literature.

   Evangelical Protestant teens most likely to approve of teacher leading
   a class in prayer What do students in public schools think about
   teachers leading a class in prayer or reading from the Bible as an
   example of literature?

   About four-in-ten (41%) say they think it is appropriate for a teacher
   in their school to lead a class in prayer, and 55% say it is
   appropriate for a teacher to read from the Bible as an example of
   literature. But there are large differences by religion.

   Among those in public schools, religiously affiliated students (49%)
   are about twice as likely as religious “nones” (25%) to think it is
   acceptable for a teacher to lead a class in prayer. Affiliated
   adolescents also are more likely than “nones” to think it is acceptable
   for a teacher to read from the Bible as literature (62% vs. 42%).

   There are large differences among religiously affiliated adolescents as
   well. For instance, six-in-ten Protestants approve of a teacher leading
   a class in prayer, compared with four-in-ten Catholics who say this.
   Evangelical Protestants are especially likely to approve of teachers
   bringing religion into the classroom: Two-thirds of evangelical
   Protestant teens (68%) say it is appropriate for a teacher to lead a
   class in prayer, compared with four-in-ten mainline Protestants (41%).
   Roughly eight-in-ten evangelical Protestant teens approve of a teacher
   reading from the Bible as an example of literature (82%), compared with
   six-in-ten mainline Protestant teens who say this (59%).

   Views toward teachers bringing religion into the classroom also vary
   across racial and ethnic groups, regions, and grade levels. Nonwhite
   teens are more supportive of teachers praying: 46% of nonwhite teens
   think it is appropriate for teachers in public schools to lead a class
   in prayer, while 36% of non-Hispanic white teens think so. But there
   are no differences between white and nonwhite teens in views toward
   teachers reading from the Bible as an example of literature.

   Teens in the South and Midwest are particularly likely to approve of
   teachers praying and reading from the Bible in class. About half (55%)
   of Southern teens in public schools say it is appropriate for a teacher
   to lead a class in prayer. By comparison, three-in-ten teens in the
   West (30%) and Northeast (28%) think it is acceptable for a teacher to
   lead a class in prayer. There is a similar pattern on the question
   about teachers reading the Bible as literature.

   Teens who have been in school for more years are less supportive of
   teachers praying in the classroom. Nearly half (47%) of pre-high school
   teens think it is appropriate for a teacher to lead a class in prayer,
   compared with 37% of those in 11th and 12th grades.

   Most teens in public schools know their teachers are not permitted to
   lead a class in prayer The survey also asked teens what they know about
   the U.S. Supreme Court’s stance on teacher-led prayer, finding that
   those in 8th grade or lower are more likely than those in 9th through
   12th grades to incorrectly say that the court permits the practice (20%
   vs. 14%).

   Overall, most U.S. teens in public schools (82%) know that their
   teachers are not permitted to lead a class in prayer, according to
   rulings by the U.S. Supreme Court. At the same time, 16% think this is
   legally allowed – although this is much smaller than the share who
   think it would be appropriate (41%). Among just those who say
   teacher-led prayer is appropriate, a somewhat higher share believe it
   is permitted by law (28%), but 70% still know that it is
   unconstitutional.

   U.S. teens are much less familiar with the law when it comes to reading
   from the Bible as an example of literature, which the Supreme Court has
   ruled permissible. About a third (36%) of U.S. teens in public school
   know that their teachers are permitted to do this, while six-in-ten
   (62%) think it is not allowed.

   Evangelical Protestant teens stand out from other traditions on this
   measure: 47% know that public school teachers are allowed to read from
   the Bible as literature, compared with about a third each of mainline
   Protestant teens (34%), religious “nones” (33%) and Catholics (32%).

   In contrast with the question about teacher-led prayer, teens in 11th
   and 12th grades are less likely to correctly answer this question than
   those in eighth grade or lower.

   There are no statistically significant differences across regions on
   either of these questions.

Relatively few teens witness religion-related bullying in schools

   Majority of teens regularly witness bullying at school To further
   explore what teens are encountering in their schools, the survey asked
   about experiences with teasing, bullying and being subject to
   unfriendly comments. The analyses of bullying and hostility toward
   religion in school include students in both religious and nonreligious
   schools (but not those who are home-schooled). ^12

   Many educators, parents, and researchers have pointed out that bullying
   is a major concern in U.S. schools, and the new survey finds that 54%
   of U.S. teens report regularly seeing students in their school being
   teased or made fun of – including 16% who say they often see this and
   38% who sometimes see it. About three-in-ten say they rarely witness
   bullying in school, while 14% say they never see it.

   Christians and religious “nones,” boys and girls, and older and younger
   teens are all about equally likely to witness bullying in school. Teens
   who live in the Midwest (59%) and the South (58%) are somewhat more
   likely than those in the West (46%) to say they see other students
   being teased or made fun of in school with any regularity. But, on the
   whole, there is little variation in how often students in these various
   demographic categories report witnessing bullying.

   Most teens rarely or never witness religiously motivated bullying in
   their school While many teens in both public and private schools
   observe bullying in their school, fewer say that they see other
   students being teased or made fun of because of their religion,
   specifically. In fact, six-in-ten (58%) say they never witness this
   type of behavior, and 28% say they rarely see it. One-in-ten say that
   they sometimes see religiously motivated bullying in their school
   (11%), and 2% see this often.

   On this question, mainline Protestants stand out from other religious
   groups as being the least likely to say that they regularly see
   religious bullying in their school. Just 3% say they witness this
   behavior at least sometimes, compared with 11% among religious “nones,”
   13% among Catholic teens and 17% among evangelicals. Evangelical teens
   are the least likely to say that they never see religious bullying in
   their school (48%).

   Across many demographic groups, most school-attending teens rarely, if
   ever, see other students being bullied for their religion. There are
   virtually no differences between boys and girls, younger and older
   teens, or across regions on this question.

   Few teens subject to religious bullying in their school Among public or
   private school students who are affiliated with a religious tradition,
   roughly one-in-ten say that they, personally, have ever been teased or
   made fun of in school because of their religion.^13

   Just 1% of mainline Protestant teens say they have ever been bullied in
   school for their religion, compared with 10% of evangelicals and 9% of
   Catholic teens who say the same.

   There are few discernible differences on this question among
   religiously affiliated teens by gender, age, and race and ethnicity.
   Roughly one-in-ten or fewer in each demographic group say they have
   personally been teased or made fun of in school because of their
   religion.

   Unaffiliated teens were asked a similar question about being teased for
   their lack of religion.  Among students who identify religiously as
   atheist, agnostic or “nothing in particular,” very few (4%) say they
   have personally experienced bullying in school because they are not
   religious.

   About one-in-ten affiliated, unaffiliated teens say other students have
   been unfriendly to their religious beliefs The survey also asked teens
   whether other students have been “unfriendly” to their religious or
   spiritual views. Those who said “yes” then had the opportunity to
   explain, in their own words, how this has occurred, with the goal of
   getting more details about any religiously motivated bullying that
   teens may be facing in school.

   Overall, about one-in-ten of all school-attending adolescents report
   that other students have been unfriendly toward their religious views.
   And they give a wide range of responses to demonstrate just what they
   are experiencing from their peers.

   Some religiously affiliated students say they have been bullied for
   their religious beliefs (3%). They report some general examples, such
   as other students “making fun of my religion,” “they make fun of me
   going to church” or “they think I attend church too much.” Other teens
   give examples of more specific comments they have experienced, such as
   “someone told me that they used to think I was intelligent until they
   found out I believed in God” and “[they] made fun of Catholics.”

   A similar share of religiously unaffiliated students (4%) give examples
   of how they feel bullied for their lack of religious beliefs. They
   report that their peers “[say] that I was the reason the country is
   going downhill” and that “they say I’ll go to hell for not believing in
   [G]od.”

   Equally small shares of both affiliated and unaffiliated teens (1%
   each) note that they have lost friends or felt distanced from former
   friends due to different beliefs.

   Few teens have experienced teachers being unfriendly to their religion
   School-attending teens are slightly less likely to say that teachers
   have been unfriendly toward their religious or spiritual views than
   they are to say the same about other students (5% vs. 9%). Those who
   report that they have experienced this type of behavior by a teacher
   cite a variety of circumstances and ways in which it has happened.

   Some teens who belong to a religion offer responses that indicate a
   teacher challenged the students’ religious beliefs, including
   questioning a student’s intelligence (2%). These teens report
   experiences such as, “I had a life science teacher once talk for 30
   minutes about why religion is stupid and a joke” and “they’ve made fun
   of me and not supported me in going to my before school scripture study
   class.”

   At the other end of the spectrum, some teens who identify as religious
   “nones” report animosity toward their views from teachers who the teens
   perceive as promoting their own beliefs (2%). One student recalls a
   teacher “posting pro Christianity posters in [the] classroom, making
   negative comments about those who don’t worship Christianity.” Another
   says: “A few teachers kinda force me to believe that [G]od is real.”

   One-in-ten teenage students report teachers making them uncomfortable
   with comments about religion The survey also asked students a more
   general question: Has a teacher ever said anything about religion that
   made you feel uncomfortable? About one-in-ten students say they have
   experienced this type of discomfort in their schools, with some small
   distinctions between those who have a religion and those who do not.

   Some religiously affiliated students share examples of teachers
   challenging religious beliefs, even if they were not personally
   challenging the respondent: “[The teachers said] that God was make
   believe and religion was to control the masses” and “taught us multiple
   religions as if they were all true.” At the same time, some students
   who identify as religious “nones” note their discomfort when they
   perceive teachers as promoting particular religious beliefs. For
   instance, one teen reports that teachers have “brought the [Ten
   Commandments] to class and preached.” Some expound on why a teacher’s
   comments were unacceptable: “This teacher was heavily promoting having
   a relationship with God as being the most important thing in life and I
   didn’t think that was appropriate to express while teaching an
   unrelated subject.”

Teenage friendships and religion

   Affiliated teens more likely to have religiously similar friends
   According to sociologists, religion is usually a social phenomenon,
   taking place among a community of believers.^14 People affect – and are
   affected by – the religious and spiritual beliefs and activities of
   their friends and family. Contemporary research points to the idea that
   social interactions promote and maintain religious worldviews.^15 And
   among teenagers, too, there is evidence that the friendships
   adolescents form in school influence their religious trajectories.^16

   Indeed, most teens have at least some friends who share their religion
   (or lack thereof). Overall, only about a quarter (27%) say that “hardly
   any” or “none” of their friends share their religion – or, in the case
   of unaffiliated respondents, that “hardly any” or “none” of their
   friends are atheist, agnostic, or have no particular religion.
   Three-in-ten teens report that most or all of their friends share their
   religion, and even more (43%) say some of their friends share their
   religious identity.

   There is good reason to expect that this should vary by religion. Most
   Americans identify as Christians of some kind, meaning it may be harder
   for nonreligious adolescents to find friends who are like them,
   religiously. That is borne out by the data: Religiously affiliated
   teens as a whole are roughly twice as likely as religious “nones” (36%
   vs. 16%) to report that most or all of their friends share their
   religion (or lack thereof). About four-in-ten unaffiliated teens (38%)
   say that hardly any or none of their friends are, like them, atheist,
   agnostic or “nothing in particular” when it comes to religion.

   Among adults, some religious groups are more likely than others to have
   friendship networks that reflect their own beliefs or affiliations.^17
   Protestants, for example, are overall less likely than Catholics,
   members of non-Christian faiths and religious “nones” to have
   interreligious social connections. But, unlike adults, Protestant
   adolescents are no more likely than Catholic teens to say that most or
   all of their friends share their religion.^18

   Aside from religious affiliation, region, age and grade play few, if
   any, statistically significant roles in the religious makeup of
   adolescents’ social networks. But gender is a factor. A third of girls
   (33%) report that most or all of their friends share their religious
   identity, making them moderately more likely than boys (27%) to be in
   that situation.

Most teens do not regularly talk to friends about religion

   Evangelical Protestant teens especially likely to talk to friends about
   religion For most teens, religion is not a regular topic of
   conversation with friends. Roughly two-thirds (64%) say they rarely or
   never talk to their friends about religion. Still, a sizable minority
   of American teenagers (36%) say they sometimes or often talk with
   friends about religion.

   Not surprisingly, religious teens are particularly likely to engage in
   these kinds of discussions. Almost half (45%) of religiously affiliated
   teens report that they regularly (that is, “sometimes” or “often”) talk
   to their friends about religion. Conversely, only 17% of unaffiliated
   teens at least sometimes talk to their friends about religion.

   But there also are differences among religiously affiliated teens. A
   majority of evangelical Protestant teens (58%) regularly talk to their
   friends about religion, compared with about four-in-ten mainline
   Protestant teens (39%) and roughly a third of Catholics (35%).

   In addition to religious affiliation, gender and region also are
   related factors. Four-in-ten girls (41%) report sometimes or often
   talking to their friends about religion; just three-in-ten boys (31%)
   say the same.

   Adolescents in the South are particularly likely to talk to their
   friends about religion. About four-in-ten Southern teens (41%) report
   doing so at least sometimes, while smaller shares in the West (31%) and
   Northeast (29%) say the same.

   There are fewer differences across age, grade, and race and ethnicity
   in how frequently teens report talking with friends about religion.
    1. Teens were asked if they have ever had a teacher lead their class
       in prayer, not just in their current school. It is possible that
       some teens who have experienced teacher-led prayer and now attend
       public schools may have attended other types of schools (for
       example, private school or home school) in the past and experienced
       teacher-led prayer in those places, which is not a violation of the
       Constitution. ↩
    2. A small share (3%) of teenage public school students did not answer
       one or both of these questions on teacher-led prayer. ↩
    3. Religion and American Public Education: Conservative Religious
       Agendas and the U.S. Constitution.” Education and Urban Society.
       Also see Cheadle, Jacob E. and Philip Schwadel. 2012. “The
       ‘Friendship Dynamics of Religion,’ or the ‘Religious Dynamics of
       Friendship’? A Social Network Analysis of Adolescents Who Attend
       Small Schools.” Social Science Research. ↩
    4. The figures for teens who attend public school here and throughout
       the report include those who say they attend charter or magnet
       schools. ↩
    5. According to 2019 estimates from the National Center for Education
       Statistics (NCES), 9% of high school students enrolled in school
       (not counting home-schooled students) are in private schools. In
       the survey sample, 5% of high school students enrolled in schools
       are in private schools. It is more difficult to calculate a
       national estimate for those who are home-schooled because U.S.
       states vary in their laws around reporting home-schooling
       statistics. Nonetheless, the NCES estimates that 4% of high
       school-aged adolescents in the U.S. were home-schooled in 2016, the
       most recent year for which the estimates are available. ↩
    6. An additional reason for this analytical decision is to avoid
       conflating the associations between adolescent characteristics and
       religious experiences in schools with the type of school teens
       attend. For example, Catholic teens who attend Catholic schools are
       presumably much more likely to experience prayer and other
       religious activities in school, which would disproportionately
       affect the Catholic figures in the analysis. See Uecker, Jeremy E.
       2008. “Alternative Schooling Strategies and the Religious Lives of
       American Adolescents.” Journal for the Scientific Study of
       Religion. ↩
    7. For a discussion of Americans’ tendency to have friends who are
       religiously like themselves, see McPherson, Miller, Lynn
       Smith-Lovin and James M. Cook. 2001. “Birds of a Feather: Homophily
       in Social Networks.” Annual Review of Sociology. ↩
    8. The net nonwhite category includes teens who identify as black,
       Asian, Hispanic, some other race, or multiple races. It is the unit
       of analysis in this survey because the sample sizes for most of the
       nonwhite categories are too small to analyze individually. The
       combined category is used in this report so that broad comparisons
       can be made to highlight differences between groups. Researchers
       prefer to break out subgroups when possible to show the differences
       that may exist between groups of people. The use of a net nonwhite
       category is not intended to obscure the fact that the religious
       experiences and behaviors of black Americans, Hispanic Americans,
       and Americans of other races and ethnicities may be quite
       different. ↩
    9. The survey did not ask teens specifically how they pray before
       lunch, therefore this practice could include everything from prayer
       with a public component (for example, prayers said aloud or prayers
       preceded by or followed by the sign of the cross) to private
       prayers that students pray silently. ↩
   10. This question was asked of both religiously affiliated and
       unaffiliated teens and included examples of religious groups (for
       example, the Fellowship of Christian Athletes) and nonreligious
       groups (the question referenced the “Secular Student Association”)
       under the broader umbrella of religious support or prayer groups. ↩
   11. Teens were asked if they have ever had a teacher lead their class
       in prayer, not just in their current school. It is possible that
       some teens who have experienced teacher-led prayer and now attend
       public schools may have attended other types of schools (for
       example, private school or home school) in the past and experienced
       teacher-led prayer in those places, which is not a violation of the
       Constitution. ↩
   12. The analyses here are expanded to include private schools because
       research shows that bullying is not limited to public schools. And,
       even when examining religiously motivated bullying, there are not
       the same concerns about conflating the type of school a teen
       attends (e.g. religious private school) with the potential types of
       unfriendliness toward religion that he or she may experience in
       that setting. See Choy, Susan P. 1997. “Public and Private Schools:
       How Do They Differ?” National Center for Education Statistics. ↩
   13. Much of the research on religion-related bullying focuses on
       minority religions, such as Judaism and Islam in the United States.
       This report, however, does not analyze responses from Jewish or
       Muslim teens separately due to insufficient sample sizes. Jewish
       and Muslim teens (and those from other religious groups) are
       included in the full sample and in the analysis of religiously
       affiliated teens. See Dupper, David R., Shandra Forrest-Bank and
       Autumn Lowry-Carusillo. 2015. “Experiences of Religious Minorities
       in Public School Settings: Findings from Focus Groups Involving
       Muslim, Jewish, Catholic, and Unitarian Universalist Youths.”
       Children & Schools. ↩
   14. The social nature of religion is a key theme in social scientific
       research. This is perhaps most famously associated with the work of
       the sociologist Emile Durkheim. Durkheim argued that interaction
       among co-religionists creates and reinforces religion by fostering
       solidarity through the creation and veneration of shared symbols.
       See Durkheim, Emile. 1912. “The Elementary Forms of the Religious
       Life.” ↩
   15. Stroope, Samuel. 2012. “Social Networks and Religion: The Role of
       Congregational Social Embeddedness in Religious Belief and
       Practice.” Sociology of Religion. ↩
   16. Cheadle, Jacob E. and Philip Schwadel. 2012. “The ‘Friendship
       Dynamics of Religion,’ or the ‘Religious Dynamics of Friendship’? A
       Social Network Analysis of Adolescents Who Attend Small Schools.”
       Social Science Research. ↩
   17. Smith, Christian. 1998. “American Evangelicalism: Embattled and
       Thriving.” ↩
   18. For the research on interreligious social connections by religious
       group, see Scheitle, Christopher P. and Buster G. Smith. 2011. “A
       Note on the Frequency and Sources of Close Interreligious Ties.”
       Journal for the Scientific Study of Religion. ↩

Pagination

   Next: Acknowledgments Next Page → ← Prev Page
    1. You are reading page 1
    2. Page 2
    3. Page 3

Report Materials

     * Complete Report PDF
     * Topline
     * Appendix A: Detailed tables
     * Essay: Religion in Public Schools

Table of Contents

     * Overview
          + Religion in school
          + Relatively few teens witness religion-related bullying in
            schools
          + Teenage friendships and religion
     * Acknowledgments
     * Methodology

Related

   PublicationsOct 3, 2019

Religion in the Public Schools

   PublicationsJul 23, 2019

What Americans Know About Religion

   PublicationsJul 15, 2019

A Closer Look at How Religious Restrictions Have Risen Around the World

   PublicationsJun 11, 2019

Americans See Catholic Clergy Sex Abuse as an Ongoing Problem

   PublicationsApr 30, 2019

In Western European Countries With Church Taxes, Support for the Tradition
Remains Strong

Topics

     * Religion and Society
     * Education
     * Teens and Youth

Popular On Pew Research

   Fact Tank01/17/2019

Defining generations: Where Millennials end and Generation Z begins

   Fact Tank09/06/2018

Are you in the American middle class? Find out with our income calculator

   Fact Tank11/28/2018

5 facts about illegal immigration in the U.S.

   Internet & Tech03/01/2018

Social Media Use in 2018

   Social Trends01/17/2019

Generation Z Looks a Lot Like Millennials on Key Social and Political Issues

   Get Pew Research Center data by email ____________________ Signup

   Pew Research Center 1615 L St. NW, Suite 800 Washington, DC 20036 USA
   (+1) 202-419-4300 | Main (+1) 202-419-4349 | Fax (+1) 202-419-4372 |
   Media Inquiries

Research Areas

     * U.S. Politics & Policy
     * Journalism & Media
     * Internet & Technology
     * Science & Society
     * Religion & Public Life
     * Hispanic Trends
     * Global Attitudes & Trends
     * Social & Demographic Trends

Follow Us

     * Email Newsletters
     * Facebook
     * Twitter
     * Tumblr
     * YouTube
     * RSS

   About Pew Research Center Pew Research Center is a nonpartisan fact
   tank that informs the public about the issues, attitudes and trends
   shaping the world. It conducts public opinion polling, demographic
   research, media content analysis and other empirical social science
   research. Pew Research Center does not take policy positions. It is a
   subsidiary of The Pew Charitable Trusts.

     * Copyright 2019 Pew Research Center
     * About
     * Terms & Conditions
     * Privacy Policy
     * Reprints, Permissions & Use Policy
     * Feedback
     * Careers

   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-N8242V9
